The government originally claimed that administration of the new law would cost taxpayers 270 million Rand (about 34 million U.S. dollars). But by the time the act was implemented, the true cost had risen to about 263 million U.S. dollars. The millions wasted on the licensing bureaucracy could have been spent actually protecting citizens.
Race is an issue and Pakatan must deal with it. And you deal with it by understanding that the Malays will not relinquish political power to anyone – least of all to the non-Malays.
Back upstairs. Sit at the table.
He served the Lord as a means of worship. He worshipped the Lord in every aspect of his human life. Who of us could say that? So I ask you again. “Whom do you serve?”
This past March, at the beginning of my Spring Break, my dad and I embarked on a trip to Ikea to purchase a wall of Billy Bookcases for my room. I realized yesterday that I never did a follow-up post to The Bookshelf Chronicles. Yes, we (or more precisely, my dad) got the wall of bookshelves up, and boy are they pretty!
It was concluded that the deaths were due to a “variant virus” or “atypical virus” that stemmed from “local conditions and the physical conditions of the hogs.” The important factor, however, is that this document was found within a file specifically focused upon bacteriological warfare. In other words, the FBI was still looking closely at any and all animal deaths that might not have wholly conventional explanations.
However, the firm’s founding dentist — a man who’s about my age, and was probably pulling teeth before young Dr. Leena was born – has the gravitas I need to confirm the extensive work will be necessary. I’ll talk to him when I get a chance.
Together, we sang, "How Great is our God".
~Bel
We think the enlarged size is a worthwhile compromise, and this Wi-Fi only model weighs in at just 260g which is 20g lighter than the original, smaller PSP 1000. So when you pick it up you’ll react to its apparent lightness.
“Sometimes there are adults with an already developed — within the body — spiritual heart. Usually they are women who know a happy, harmonious marriage, including motherhood.
Now if you finished both trailers....isn't that the saddest thing you've seen....
For some reason, hydrogen generator proponents seldom try to size the generator to the engine. This line would also result in a far larger hydrogen generator than any I've seen tried on a car. On the other hand, if you feed an engine that much hydrogen, it'll definitely get some sort of results...
12. Sequence 12 (00:40)
When I emerge from the lake, sometimes slowly throughout a day and sometimes I wake up feeling as though I was washed ashore and don't remember even hitting the sand, I feel renewed and Spiritually revitalized. I take several days to look back at my Episode and learn from it, all the while the Dark Mother is still with me teaching and watching over me. I learn about the Darkness that is within me (as it is within everyone). I look that Darkness in the eye and thank The Goddess for it. That Goddess is Inanna. She spends half the year in the Underworld and the other half on Earth. I liken her to a true Goddess of Bipolar.
turn on the heat medium high and bring to a boil. as soon as it is boiling put the lid on and let cook for 2 to 3 minutes to build up the steam and then turn to low heat and cook for about 45 to 60 minutes or until the liquid is all absorbed. check every once in a while.
He shall wash his feet in the blood of the wicked,
Rinse the quinoa well, bring the water to a boil and add the quinoa, cook for 12-14 minutes or until cooked through. Drain, set aside.
If you were to ask Miss Saarah what the most important part of getting ready to go to the park is, she would tell you that ensuring adequate hair-clip-use is right near the top of the list. If one or two hair clips are nice, then how much better would 247 hair clips be?
And for kicks, I just HAVE to mention this. The video for the song was directed by Bob Rafelson and produced by Michael Nesmith. Rafelson was the producer on The Monkees and Michael was a one of Monkees! I thought that was awesome since I love those guys so much. What a great coincidence!
With non-Mexican sellers the law was not very clear as to the definition of a resident so most notaries in Mazatlan accepted the FM3 document which was available from the local immigration office. On May 4, 2010 a letter was sent to the President of the Mexican Notaries Association from the SAT (which is the Mexican IRS) to clarify many issues to do with the capital gain. One of these issues was the definition of residency of a non-Mexican citizen. On April 30, 2010 the Mexican Immigration Institution launched a series of changes in an effort to modernize systems. So now the Fm3 will be referred to as a non –immigrant or “no-inmigrante”. Fm2 will be referred to as an immigrant permit or “inmigrante” and the landed immigrant status will be referred to as “inmigrado”.
Some Grocery Store Flowers 24 x 16, February 2012
Shadow C1, C3
I told FB about it...
Baby spinach (organic): $1.50/pkg after sale and coupon, used 1/4 = $.38
So a Mulled Wine’n’Mince Pie (the ‘n’ was ironic, by the way. I am not a fan of ‘n’s. What wrong with a good old fashioned And? I might start a campaign. Stand Up For And. Catchy) party is held Chez Young (the chez is also ironic. I’m in an ironic mood. And what’s wrong with that? Nothing wrong with a bit of irony. I’m obviously in a peevish mood as well as an ironic one. And what’s wrong with that? Nothing wrong with a bit of ranting that extends a parenthesis. Good old parentheses, that’s what I say. They always get short shrift, and they deserve so much more. The Bob Cratchits of the grammatical Christmas Carol) every year.
Double Dot Brilliant Blue Dot
BROENS, DE GROOF, M. VAN RANST. Griepvaccinatie van gezondheidswerkers blijft ondermaats. Katholieke Universiteit Leuven, Persdienst. URL: http://www.kuleuven.ac.be/nieuws/berichten/2003/pb16_09_03b.htm
I saw the first screening in 3D at Stratford Picturehouse. Most of the sudience members were very young men. They all loved it. Not a single phone rang nor did the glow of apps disturb the light from the screen.
Fortunately, that’s not the end of the story.
What the hell? She can tell by my voice that I'm far away? "I understand ma'am, but I can assure you I'm in the U.S. I'm three states east of you."
Bersih 3.0 co-chairperson S Ambiga told FMT yesterday that about 100,000 are expected to turn out for the rally. Her steering committee member Maria Chin Abdullah said today: “Maybe even more.”
I created a chessboard piece by weaving cardstock together, and using Ranger distress inks to age it. The chessboard is adhered only on three sides so it's perfect for a journaling pocket, ephemera, etc. The image of Alice and the March Hare are Ching-Chou Kuiks' stamps. I used Stampers Anonymous images for the sentiments on the card and page.
Agbla F, Ergin A, Boris NW. Occupational working conditions as risk factors for preterm birth in Benin, West Africa. Rev Epidemiol Sante Publique 2006; 54: 157-165.
I took to breathing watercolor air.
From the learning rooms...God does things in His time and I wait. Today in conversation with a work colleague I found out some news we had both been waiting on. For me this means I can find it much easier to "let go." God has given me some answers and He will lead on the rest of my prayers too. I am thinking that when we find prayer difficult and answers elusive,change the prayer: Instead of asking "Why? God" ask "What can I learn?" I remember this bible verse:
It's not often that I get excited about foundation so I think this one is pretty special. Chanel's newest foundation, Perfection Lumière, has quickly become my favourite because it provides a relatively matte finish. I apply it between 7-8am in the morning, powder my forehead ever so lightly, and I don't need any touch-ups during the day. My forehead doesn't shine, as it always does with all other foundations, and even at 6pm it looks good, with only a minimal amount of shine.
Posted By: George Harvey
Later, King David heard that Bethsheba was pregnant, so he immediately sent message and set things up to kill Uriah, so, Uriah, the husband of Bethsheba got killed.
wonder marks the sight of
Bring your gifts before God, acknowledging who you were before God took hold of you.
Obama folks are indoor folks, verbal folk, deceitful folk determined to fulfill a mission they imagine to be holy….Marxism. They do not believe in equality. They are devoted to create and maintain equality of others.
Who firmly believes that two, or three, head are better than one
Simian Mobile Disco (UK)
Freaking out and tired from white-knuckling it the whole way, I hop out of my seat and hear a crackle against the ground. Unbeknownst to me, my 3 month old 4G Samsung $$$ Epic, lay on the streets of downtown Cleveland, screen cracked but still functioning. Had to make a trip to Best Buy the next day to get a case and screen protector so I wouldn't keep scratching my fingers up when I used it.
I realized this week that writing for me is just like running.
As this is a rough study, for a finished piece, I would redraw everything, being more careful about my angles and lining things up properly. Instead, I wanted to get the big picture in my mind first.
My phone calls to any relative I have in the USA is being monitored.I am just calling my family on the phone.
Its getting so I can never trust a moments peace I know that at any minute my children may enter. I may never be able to watch a show that is not rated G again -just-in-case. Why cant they make a crib with the bars on the top so her mommy can have a little drink in peace. Is that so wrong...
Today He is yours, if today you will be His. What if dark death prevents tomorrow’s light? He was yesterday, so were you: He is today, so are you: He is tomorrow, but maybe you will not be. Time may change you, although it cannot change Him. He is not subject to natural change like you.
The story became even more gruesome when they traced the crime to a group of men calling themselves the Gentlemen Of The Club, otherwise known as a weird pop group called Metgumbnerbone, who specialised in Tibetan trumpet music. These young men had used the bones they had taken from the crypts to make musical instruments by drilling small holes in them.
“The current subsidy regime in which fixed price is maintained irrespective of market realities has resulted in huge unsustainable subsidy burden,” the document says.
The messengers of the Incommunicable,
Informants of all kinds, some CIA “whistleblowers,” some Army, some honest decent people who were lied to were “set up” to sell this story, this fabrication about Osama bin Laden and Al Qaeda, not one word of truth in all of it.
Heat oil and add mustard seeds, urad dhal and curry leaves. Next add onion and saute till light brown. Add the ground paste and stir in for few minutes for the raw smell to leave like about 3 - 4 minutes. Next add the powders(turmeric and chilli powder) and mix once. Immediately add the cooked and chopped raw banana along with salt and fry together for 2 - 3 minutes adn serve. Garnish with chopped coriander leaves if needed.
Very convenient, this Seditions Act. It is something that belongs in George Orwell’s 1984. Remember terms like Newspeak and Thoughtcrime? If you don’t, read more here.
from the leafless trees, morning air rushing through
24 inches of snow was dumped on my little part of Pa.
So Jesus is described as a horn of Salvation, the significance of horn as a three fold object, first as strength (also translated as authority and government) this meaning is from the horn on the animal itself, the second significance is that horns used to be filled with oil for anointing and finally the horn as an instrument that is blown typically in a battle or victory declaration. There is so much significance and promise in Jesus as a metaphorical horn. So Jesus was described as an instrument that God has raised up, so, ‘can we be instruments too?’ Well, Paul makes it obvious that the answer is yes, yes we are. I am going to share a few things I learnt from this truth that God revealed to me in a new way.
John Donne was the original metaphysical poet. Fellow poet John Dryden wrote of him: "He affects the metaphysics, not only in his satires, but in his amorous verses, where nature only should reign; and perplexes the minds of the fair sex with nice speculations of philosophy, when he should engage their hearts, and entertain them with the softnesses of love."
I just want to lift this child up to you lord, keep him safe until he arrives here with us, help him to grown strong. I pray that as he lays his sweet little head on his earthly bed, that you bless his mommy and daddy, you protect him and enable his parents to teach him your ways. Be with Angela and give her patience, and lots of rest so she can begin to instill your love and grace and mercy into his heart and mind, thank you for this child lord, Amen.
I finished Neuromancer by William Gibson, Around The World In 80 Days by Jules Verne and 1984 by George Orwell for the Around The Stacks In How Many Ways – Challenge! With Science Fiction, Dystopian and Adventure I covered three genres already! I think I will change the challenge settings for me though. I think I will not determine which books I want to use for this challenge and which genres I want to read. I want to read what I feel like reading and not feel obliged to read a certain book next. That kind of takes the fun out of it for me and I really don’t want that!
It is housed in a 1 acre climate controlled hall.
Once I get the Pinterest site fleshed out a little, via my own searches, and (hopefully) other people’s submissions, I’ll re-launch the story, with links. I’m going to put a $.99 price on it – just to differentiate it from the freebie version that’s been so downloaded (I’m at just about 5000 downloads on that one now.) We’ll see how the interactive/enhanced components, added to a greater stress on the “series intro” aspect do.
Perhaps he comes into our lives in a very small, mouse-like way, almost an unnoticeable way. Like a swift, dark shadow of movement in the periphery. Like the slight chill which travels up the spine, in consideration of what you think you saw, in that moment.
i've been wearing a bracelet that noone would ever think was a sign of mourning. he's been growing his hair. and i didn't even realise. all this time, even if it hasn't been visible - even to me, the person who knows him best - he has been mourning too. he's even had a visible sign on his person, like i did. like me though, it's one that's not obvious.
Chronicles of Blood is a solitaire wargame developed by Crystal Star Games. It’s a fantasy mass battles game where the basic unit is the regiment, represented by several figures on a base. It’s an amazingly clever and elegant design, which you should check yourself because it is absolutely free. You can find it in DriveThruRPG to name just one.
Kyle looked at Jim and I saw sparks fly in both their eyes.
39.4: Number Of Weeks That It Takes To Find A Job. (Bureau of Labor Statistics, Accessed 4/10/12)
‘Twas how my “Life play” was cast!
From one coconut take 1/2 cup of thick coconut milk and 1 cup of thin coconut milk.
Saturday was a pretty low key of wandering around Madrid and getting off my feet nice and early in order to get some rest before Sunday's race. With a 9am race time and a room in the race's host hotel (Kenyans and Ethiopians included), I didn't have to wake up too early. I went to bed around 10pm...about 15 minutes before Real Madrid defeated Barcelona in El Clásico, one of the biggest football rivalries in the world, for the first time in 5 years. If you know anything about European football, you will know that the city then erupted into celebrations that lasted well into the middle of the night making sleep nearly impossible.
One of the things we may take for granted in this country is high-speed internet access nearly everywhere we go. Not the case in the rural areas of Honduras. Now that we’re back, we can highlight the rest of our trip to Honduras with Global Medical Brigades. We hope you enjoy. (Be sure to click the photos to see them full-size…)
"You're not working today?" I asked to start to relax the strange vibe in the space.
2 No, slg, not "whom", if you were thinking of challenging that; the nominative case is called for here because "who" is the subject of "is" even though subject and verb, in this instance, are separated by nine words of parenthetical observations.
1 lb frozen peas
The Anouk pattern is very similar to a Built by Wendy Simplicity dress/top pattern from a few seasons ago. And the Ava reminds me of Colette Macaron. I already own both of those patterns, so I probably won't be purchasing from Victory Patterns just yet. But I'll keep them on my radar!
Avoid harsh or drying cleansers as well as greasy cleansers since either extreme will react unfavorably with your skin type. The best skin cleanser, regardless of the skin type is a water-soluble cleanser that is gentle on the skin.
Today, I printed on my dining table, wearing the apron that I wear when I bake with my daughter. I used spoons from my kitchen for the ink, and washed my screen off in the bath tub. That’s blending art and domesticity for you. I’m totally not set up for this kind of activity here, but that makes it all the more sweeter. I overcame the odds and screen printed today! Who needs a studio? Well, maybe I do. I’ll get there one day.
The thing is, after two hours of sleep I could not return to relaxation
skin screen.
What to do what to do. I don't want to feel all guilty when my son and I wake up in an hour or two and I haven't done anything "productive" while he was asleep... and then I remember. The top things on my to do list today are 1. Be a good mommy and wife and 2. grow a healthy baby.
If you don't like reading about poop, stop here. :)
It also works on the desktop app when you plug in your camera or phone to the computer. It will automatically upload and save your photos and video to DropBox’s Camera Upload folder when you select “Import Pictures and Videos using Dropbox.”
I didn’t hate this movie.
Let's see.
Now, I have my OWN window frame that I see every day and LOVE LOVE LOVE.
I’ve studied beyond ﬂogged.
This was too pretty, I just had to take a minute from my day to share her pictures.
Now and through eternity.
May is BPD (Borderline Personality Disorder) Awareness Month. BPD is a mental health condition that comes with a lot of stigma attached to it. Also known as Emotionally Unstable Personality Disorder, as this name suggests it is a condition characterised by unstable emotions, you can read more about what BPD is here. For now I just wanted to share ’5 reasons having a mental health condition is nothing to be ashamed of’ to help raise awareness of the difficulties of living with a mental health problem…
And thus ends our time together in Multimedia Writing… I could lie and say I’m sad to see it end, but that would be a lie. At this time of the year (and after a few days of non-stop studying), I hate everything. I have no room in my heart for nostalgia especially for the thing currently causing my torment—Temple University. My brain is fried, I have crammed enough notes into the margins of my Survey of American Lit I anthology for my open-book final tomorrow, and I’m just ready to explode from exhaustion.
What could have been just an Exorcist clone actually evolved into something else as I watched. The dynamics between all the leads helps to craft not just a horror film, but a dysfunctional family drama as well.
Now some of us focus on how He destroyed the idolatrous powers of Egypt. Others fixate on God deliverance of His people. His motive though is clearly stated in 7:5.
Your just like chalk..
The playground equipment is gone! Poof! Disappeared! The tallest slide (which was too tall in my opinion) was blocked off at the top because the plastic was broken inside of the slide near the bottom. And honestly, I did not think the little bridge section was very safe for little ones, although I don't think it was meant for toddlers.
Therapist: Sounds like you have the right preparations in your car if they show at your place, that is good. Your sister is in a vulnerable place, likely part of the evasive behavior. It is good that you will have your car. You are still very vulnerable, your daughter. They know you will do anything for her. You are also in a dangerous spot carrying that DNA proof of the truth with you in your womb. That is good that the lawyer is getting all that stuff. That is very good. You also have loads of evidence in you shed. You have the InstaCare report. Don’t worry about timing. I went out of my way to get reception, primarily with you in mind. I knew this was a big day for you.
If your goal is to retire, you know that every day you wait to start saving money is either one day longer you have to wait, or a little bit lower standard of living in your retirement years.
If he does love me, why can’t he be patient? Why does he not see that if he pushes me, I will probably leave? I do love him. I don’t know that I am in love with him. And I am not in love with someone else. My Sweet is a very special person to me. But he is in no way ready or willing to leave his wife. I understand that and am fine with it. I’m sad that he is sad, but I respect his marriage. He is my friend and if that is all there is, I am ok with that. I prefer that to nothing at all.
22cm mini helicopter.
The five inmates were forced to dance to Usher’s “Yeah!” One tore up the floor with “the worm,” a popular hip-hop dance move. At least three other sheriff’s deputies watched — and stood watch to make sure no supervisors were around, investigators said.
My Dad is dealing out some bitter chips
The card base is Wild Wasabi and cut to 4 1/4 x 11 and folded in half after scoring on the Simply Scored. I them added a some Blushing Bride cut to 4 x 4 1/2and added a strip of DSP cut to 1 1/4 x 4 to the bottom of it. I stamped the saying with Black Stazon onto a piece of Whisper White Cardstock cut to 1 1/4 x 2 1/2 and the green mat to 1 3/8 x 2 5/8. The image piece is again stamped with Black Stazon on to Whisper White Card stock cut to 2 x 3 . I did a little Maker layering and coloring. I did light green and added just a touch of the dark green towards the bottom of the leaves. Can you see? The green mat beneath is cut to 2 1/8 x 3 1/8. The flower layer was taped to the card and the saying was popped up with dimensionals. the cute bow is attached with a glue dot. The little circle was stamped with a little stamp from a set called Mixed Bunch in Blushing Bride and mounted on a circle of Blushing Bride cardstock. The I popped it up with a dimensional.
Well, today is the last day before the kids go back to school tomorrow. And it's back to early wake up days so no more late night crafting for me. I really enjoyed staying up late to craft. I better not get too carried away blogging today either since I am doing laundry again and got a pot of corned beef on our small stove. I don't want to forget about them!
" Knit a sweater? No sweat!"
But let's talk sights and sounds! After two visits to this fantastic city, I've got some favorites so I made a shortlist (leaving out things we liked but weren't enamoured with, like the Ghost Tour we took, the too-small Marimekko concept store in Cambridge, etc):
After several years hard work and negotiation, the Wales Coast path runs completely around the coastline for all to enjoy.
The summer weather is sublime.
Besides, I’m really disturbed by the frequency of finding hair in my food after today’s incident, which marks the 3rd time in 3 months.
Let me just tell you, visiting a salvage yard is an interesting experience.
And return
The man was a soldier. Soon,war
SweetP and Shug are sleeping in their new room now. As of last night. There's no door on the room, mind you, but they were beyond ready. We ordered a new bunkbed for them, and it was delivered last week. Sam was able to put it together after many hours of travail on Saturday evening. They really love it. Very fun.
This last weekend (Fri Apr 27 at 11am pst – Sun Apr 29 12:59 pm) was the first “open” (you had to pre-purchase) Guild Wars II beta.
I'm iffy on Full Sail, but was pleasantly surprised by their Session Lager so I'm hoping this will be a surprise as well.
Seeing suitcases or bags (she thinks I'm leaving her)
I knew that my D’Arcy’s Diaries image would be perfect for this. Smiles. I actually coloured her through the week, as part of my “crash” time – you know, that twilight hour when all the hard work is finished, but you’re simply buzzing too much to fall in to bed right away, but too exhausted to do much of anything. Well out came my Copics and my stack of various images I had pre-printed before everything got packed away. “Under My Umbrella” was one of them – she had to be, she’s been one of my firm favourites ever since I ‘found’ D’Arcy’s. Smiles.
By and large, when he conducted the World Philharmonic
by Laura Purdie Salas (Author) and Violeta Dabija (Illustrator)
What’s his size?
Merry Christmas from my family to yours!
When you completely relinquish
Moving from characterisation, I have another problem with the movie — its pace and timeframe. The whole thing takes place in a few weeks/months of election campaign. Why the rush? The Godfather plays out over years. I just didn’t see the need to compress Rajneeti – its time frame should have been years, not weeks. The blood feud it shows would easily last years, decades even — just observe Bangladeshi politics.
by Doug Lawrence
In a hollow cave, beautifully moonlit.
11-Back Stab Gospel
After all these years of reading books and magazines, internet searches, attending courses and open days, and seeking knowledge from other gardeners, I feel inclined to recommend to any newcomer to gardening, do not read gardening books, save your hard-earned and spend it on seeds and tube stock. Stand back, meditate, and let nature do its
However, there is good news. First of all, it makes sense. The diagnosis came with a bit of relief (ok, not gonna lie, AFTER I bawled my eyes out) because I knew this had gone on too long, with too little relief even though I'd done everything in theory that should relieve a calf strain. I'll be 100% honest here, I have suspected a stress fracture for a while now. I put it out of my head at first because according to my research, a fracture that high up seemed to be pretty rare. The spot that hurt (the one spot where I had a pinpoint pain) was the same exact spot that hurts due to patellar tendonitis. Therefore, I chalked it up to PT, even though my wonderful knee strap not only did NOT alleviate it, it made it hurt worse. (Well, no wonder. I was putting a tight strap right over a fracture. Ow ow ow.)
Years ago while serving as Area Director for South and Southeast Asia, I had the responsibility of dispersing the budget for more than 500 missionaries in the 15 countries of that region. We monitored receipts to CP and LMCO knowing it would affect the resources we had available. Even though there were usually increases in these income streams, it was never enough to meet our budget needs. I was the one who had to determine which programs would be cut back, which new initiatives would be deferred, etc.
Fantasy List:
This study joins the many other studies showing that homeschoolers do better on standardized tests than do schooled kids, which isn't really surprising. And I don't personally feel that yet another study saying so adds anything to the home education movement as a whole. We already know that, and personally, I'm just tired of standardized tests being held up as the one and only sign of success for children and teens. Instead, I worry that, as flawed as the methods in this study are, it will add fuel to the fire of disapproval directed at unschoolers, both from society at large and from within the home education community.
The Ninth Circuit had read Sony too widely. Sony did not say that secondary infringement was an impossibility where a product is capable of a substantial lawful use. However, according to the Supreme Court, Sony only laid down this rule where liability was being placed on the maker of the means of infringement by imputing an intention to enable infringement based solely on the design of the means of infringement. Others forms of secondary infringement were unaffected by Sony.
“Know ye not that your body is the temple of the Holy Ghost which is in you, which ye have of God.”
“10 He read in their hearing all the words of the Book of the Covenant, which had been found in the temple of the LORD… 33 Josiah removed all the detestable idols from all the territory belonging to the Israelites, and he had all who were present inIsraelserve the LORD their God. As long as he lived, they did not fail to follow the LORD, the God of their ancestors.”
When I’m in my urn.
I picked up M and we headed up to Rockefeller Park (have I mentioned I love having a car?!) There was a big group in the parking lot, but we all split up into smaller groups because you aren't supposed to run in big groups. We ran 8 miles of trails, enjoyed banana-walnut pancakes with J, R, and M at the local diner. One of the runners was from South Hadley, MA. Small world. Back at home I watch Ghost and did some GRE studying. I was surprised. I thought my verbal would be worse than my quantitative, but it was actually the reverse. That makes me happy because I feel like it is easier to cram for the quantitative if I decide to. In the evening M and I had dinner at the Harlem Tavern and drinks at a 67 bar (what a cute spot!). M has known me since I was 11 - went to MS, HS, college, and moved to NYC. We know a lot about each other's lives. I didn't get home til around 11. Another weekend filled with lots of good things to do.
Still, when we did re-connect it was as if no time had passed. We quickly caught up on one another’s lives – our kids, husbands and grandkids. We exchanged pictures and I finally asked about Grandpa and why he had turned his back on me.
Let the Yuri Nation rejoice with the knowledge of a better future!
Plus, if I washed my jeans I might miss out on the chance of seeing a beautiful ordinary boy on the train after a hard night while wearing my dirty jeans…
If I believed in luck then I would say that I’m one lucky girl. I don’t believe in luck. Instead I believe that I am on blessed girl.
Let no one kill nor cause another to kill.
After dinner, I went for a swim! Go me! I've moved from every other day swimming or PT (physical therapy) to trying to do it daily as long as my knee feels good. This could also be where the exhaustion is coming in because between swimming and PT, I haven't had a rest day since last Wednesday until today. But each day my knee is getting stronger.
While Singapore must remain open to the world, we must be extremely selective on the immigrants we accept. Unfortunately, the seemingly uncontrolled immigration in the last few years has led to many foreigners being given Singapore citizenship without truly understand what it means to be a Singaporean.
The WTO is about trade between counties. Obeying the ruling means the U.S. allows an organization outside of the country to determine our laws. They do not care about laws written to protect the environment or public health. The WTO has no investment in the future health of our teens. For now, the ban stands.
KO: "Huzzah!"
Wednesday-We started a Percy Jackson Unit Study. This is something that my oldest wanted to do. We read the first chapter of the first book (which she has read three times and I have read once) and started some activities. She did a Vocab puzzle, got 3 words into a 2nd puzzle and said "I'm bored" so she moved on to writing in her journal, then she started making a family tree. Then at 6 we had auditions for a play. My oldest (Marti) bought a Cinderella play (this actually http://search.barnesandnoble.com/Now-Im-Reading-Plays/Nora-Gaydos/e/9781584769729/?itm=1&USRI=cinderella+play) and yesterday she planned a gathering of her friends and they did the play, or auditioned, or practiced it. I had to take the car to the shop so daddy (the theatre buff) stayed with them. We need new brakes, fun!
Very Special Mystery Guest Keg
The one thing I keep telling her, which I hope will help her not be scarred for life by this, is that she will never again have to have 7 shots at one time (well, 5 shots, a finger prick and a TB prick). She will still need shots, but from now on it will only be one or two at a time.
Even more amazing, Solomon and the entire lineage of David were the ancestors of Jesus Christ, God’s own son. What the world saw as failure, God saw as fodder.
This is an activity that goes far beyond just memorizing meanings of words...it lets kids make connections!!! You can do this as a pre-assessment, a quick check mid-way through a unit or prior to a test...
By sharing what you know, you actually attract people to you and build their confidence in you as the right solution for their problem. Now many professionals are afraid to “give away” trade secrets or expertise for free, but that’s not what I’m talking about. This is about putting content regularly out into the marketplace that is of enough value that prospects will automatically think of you when they have a need.
People have a very strong relationship with their cellphones. So whatever.
In a very small space between the hands
Sick of this Animal Farm crap.
This weekend our family met to celebrate her 96th birthday. Though she has trouble getting around physically, her mind is just as sharp as it ever was....and then some.
Perhaps this is not surprising: We are facing conditions that rival those of the 1930s, the main difference being that the media seems stubbornly willing to acknowledge it. It raises intriguing questions about the role of the media itself in American society. Radical critics usually assume the “corporate media”, as they call it, mainly exists to convince the public that existing institutions are healthy, legitimate and just. It is becoming increasingly apparent that they do not really see this is possible; rather, their role is simply to convince members of an increasingly angry public that no one else has come to the same conclusions they have. The result is an ideology that no one really believes, but most people at least suspect that everybody else does.
Gretchen
There’s always lot’s going on in So Cal when it comes to Saints, Guru’s and teachers spreading their light, love and teachings from India. We are blessed here in Los Angeles and surrounding cities. This week, I had the opportunity to be in the presence of Pujiya Swamiji Chidanand Saraswatiji, H.H. Sri Shankaracharya Swami Divyanand Teerthji and Amritananda Mayi Ma (Amma – the Hugging Saint). Try saying those names fast : )
The Matron has refrained, thus far, from blogging about a particular miniseries in her life -- out of respect and consideration for the person at the center of the storm.
I am sure my mom heard that more often than she cared. I was/am THE Pickiest eater ever, and I wonder why my kids don't eat certain things.
BBQ Kalbi will be serving lunch at BLOOM ENERGY (1299 Orleans Drive, Sunnyvale) 11:30 – 1:45. Open to public and yes we accept credit card.
Dear Dave Barry,
Friday night we got a great cultural experience at Bar Amigos when a band played. The place was packedd and the dance floor was too with people dancing salsa or whatever the song demanded. It was a great cultural night to watch, but even more so to be a part of. We were able to meet many locals throughout the night, which was also great to help me with my Spanish.
You raised your hand and you brushed it against my cheek
This exhibit is currently on display at the Dorchester Senior Citizens Center through the summer and is available for public viewing. In addition there is a permanent display of the other crafts made by the seniors that is also open to the public. Please call the center at 718-941-6700 for hours of operation and come on by. We'd love to see you.
"Hello dear, it's been such a long day"
Funny though, it's more malty than hoppy in the taste. That's fine, just different. And it may be a bit old... If so, though, it aged very well. Bitterness comes out more in the aftertaste, and is actually pretty nice.
I am frequently asked about when I am going to teach a Copic 3 class. Well, the answer to that is next Monday. If that is a bit too short of notice (I just can't imagine why), I will also be teaching it on Wed, July 20 and Sun, August 14.
Thanksgiving and Christmas are always bitter sweet for me. I LOVE them. I play music, I make cookies, I get all "tra-la-la, it's Christmas, time to break out the ELF movie and cozy up". But I'm also very "where the F*** are those F***ing scientist Mother-F***ers hiding, and why haven't they invented teleportation yet?" (Yeah, I'm talking to you mr., pardon me, DR. physicist. Sheldons of the world, UNITE and get your asses on this!)
The man increased his price to $25 each and the supply of monkeys became so sparse that it was an effort to even see a monkey, much less catch one.
PeyPey: "This is difficult news to process. I'm not really sure where to go from here."
No wonder the place looks creepy.
The rains have stopped. I’m happy for Housekeeper. She want to go fishing this weekend, just to get away from people.
Sherry Came to town with her partner in crime Jean Bernard ... They are a Dynamo combination of Talent ,where one leaves off the other one picks up .. Sherry is so down to earth and Jean is a little shy, they complement each other making for a workshop full of techniques that I'm sure I will use on many other Dolls ...
BoB reaches the French camp, where they make short work of a few guards and locate the barrels of gunpowder in the kitchen wagons. They spill one along the line of wagons, light the gunpowder, and blow everything sky high. So long, cannon!
The Sun.
Me: Hm, I suppose we should make a Christmas list for Xena. What do you think she’d want? More sparkly balls? Another shoelace to chase around? Some treats and gooshy food?
As class president, you have a tendency to believe that your crap doesn’t have an odor. It does. Follow your insistence on being involved, on being busy and go-go-going. Know that this will be a hallmark of who you are as a grown-up woman.It will continue to be something that fulfills you.
Bethany grew up in Mercer, Pennsylvania, and she would pass by this courthouse on the way to her grandmother's house. She writes that it can be seen from very far away. Mercer is not far from where I live, and I have seen this courthouse. It is set up on a high hill and is indeed a visible from miles away.
And Grace, my fears relieved.
Earth Crisis
Now to move on.
“I Wanna Rock”
Tight across her thunderous bust
2 expect
Interestingly, the parallels with English are not exact. English has a simple present “I work” and a present progressive (or continuous) “I am working”. As I have previously worked as an English teacher, I am broadly familiar with the breakdown. Simple present ” I work” for descriptive or habitual; Progressive for currently. Examples, “I work for a multinational” but “I am working on my blog (at this moment).”
Now we have a new movie to look forward to. I'm eager to see it, the most eager for an Avengers project since the crossover. That's saying something.
1/2 cup seasoned bread crumbs
The fact that anyone thinks I would means they never really knew me in the first place.
Judgment: All and all, not the greatest movie ever, but an interesting take on people trying to find their way in the world.
Visions of pumpkin pies, pumpkin bread, pumpkin muffins, pumpkin pancakes, pumpkin crunch, and my favorite pumpkin roll fill my mind! Can't wait to whip up all my autumn recipes with my home canned orange loveliness... Pumpkin!
I had my "big" Block 2 Interview today, and was so nervous for NO REASON! Like a lot of Olathe Principals were going to drive down to interview us, what was I thinking? There were three people there and they were super nice! I'm pretty sure the guy that interviewed me is the same guy that Scott loved to work for when he was translating up there. Small world and all! Either way it went well!
5/22/10:30am – Kraeusen starting to form, just a thin film. Temp = 66˚.
Oooh, that was harder than I thought to just list seven! Let me channel my inner rebel again and suggest that you should check the "Blogs You Should Read" section in my sidebar for more links to smart folks. AND, if you are so inclined, I invite you to try this meme, too, even if I didn't "tag" you! If you do, please share the link! I'd love to read it!
in her voice, as she knelt gently down beside her father's chair......
Against my idea is that fact that a cognitively intact individual can have tons of senile plaques at autopsy.
The story feels a little like the weaving of a tapestry - thread after thread pulling together to create a glorious whole. I really enjoyed the unveiling of some of the mysteries - and I'm glad that some of them have been left to discover in the further two novels of the trilogy.
This is not just a matter for legislation. We expect and encourage all private parties, including both content creators and Internet platform providers working together, to adopt voluntary measures and best practices to reduce online piracy.
The half of people that DO purchase using direct-draw ATM/check cards do this do it an average of 3 times a week, or 12 times a month. The government just passed a new regulation capping the transfer fee at 21 cent cap. I thought credit cards charged 29 cents per transaction? 21 cents seems kinda low! Actually, upon cursory inspection, they charge about 2% of the sale. That’s a lot. The costs add up. I know they do, because I’ve gone to places that only take cash because they don’t want to pay for all the credit card transaction fees. Gas stations often give you a cheaper per-gallon rate if you pay in cash. Cash is king.
I am excited that a BAYOU TECHE BIÈRE was reviewed by such a renowned national magazine. Our petite brewery that only sells beer in Southern Louisiana appeared in a Belgian newspaper and now we have been favorably reviewed by an English writer and New York based brewmaster who are respected authorities on beer. I read Oliver’s The Brewmasters Table once a month and everything that Roger Protz wrote while my family and I were planning our Arnaudville brewery. When I was not brewing or drinking beer, I was reading about brewing or drinking beer. I am grateful that our first beer has been recognized by two beer experts whose writings have inspired me to open Bayou Teche Brewing.
Over the weekend, my family was treated to my very own favourite flavour pairings. Peanut Butter and Chocolate. I just love the rich creamy taste of peanut butter, and when nobody's watching, I would just eat it as it is with a spoon licking it sparkly clean. Delish!!
· Pasquale Rotella, CEO and founder, Insomniac
When the cream is formed fold in the blueberry syrup. Check for sugar add more if needed. Cover the bowl with a plastic warp and keep it in the freezer for 1 hour i.e. the mixture should be half frozen.
Roy: Where?
I do however like this shirt, although I'm unsure if my shoulder length barnet can pull it off? I feel a little butch in it hence the awkward snaps but it's so comfy and versatile so it's going to be a keeper. And I am rather in love with this necklace, I was contacted by a lovely lady named Susan from Accessories Direct who gave me the choice of some gorgeous jewellery to review, being a sucker for anything chunky I chose this straight away, I really like the black and gold together and if I listen to Sam Sparrow I can pretend he's singing at me. This is by a designer named Kate Benjamin so if you like what you see have a looky, her pieces are pricier than what I might normally go for (this necklace retails at £48.00) but from the weight and feel of it I can tell it's going to be a trooper and last a long time!
there is no longer worry or dismay
AD/HD moment. Back to the Pig. I was going to mention, I don't think I made anything worse, injury-wise. I wondered for a moment after a big hill - I was HURTING - but after a couple of miles of relative flatness, my leg felt fine. It still feels ok. My glutes were pretty sore from the walking (again, newfound respect for walkers!) and my calf tightened up a bit, but it's not painful. I almost tried running yesterday but I think it still would've been hobbly. I have PT this morning and I'm not leaving without some answers. I haven't been in much actual pain for a couple of weeks, but my leg is stiff and weak enough that running is still not possible.
1 distortion
The al pastor, on the other hand, is less consistent. Sometimes I'm very pleased, and sometimes I'm left unsatisfied. I do not order chicken at Jalisco style taquerias.
Maintain our Structure
Well, March has come and gone and I have a small update to how “Slip Drive” and “Hiroko’s Tale” have done over that month. Hiroko didn’t do much of anything so I won’t speak on it, but “Slip Drive” ended up selling 30 copies over that month. That is actual sales, not freebies. I make that distinction because I see a lot of people talk about their numbers, but they tend to only mention their free units.
Cycle 18 of AMERICA’S NEXT TOP MODEL: BRITISH INVASION (9:00-10:00 p.m.) concludes Wednesday, May 30.
Last night was our monthly girls night too, so fun!
She said “Welcome to the land of the living dead”. You could tell she was
You will need to be flexible of course as some days will require more study time then others (e.g. large exam next day) and some days you might have to shift your time around due to unforseen commitments (e.g. Grandma’s surprise party).
Your eyes, you told me, as though I couldn't see,
The fox-crow beak saw the old sea swelling with tumultuous ice
He asked me if i'd ever heard of "Lieutenant Pigeon", and admittedly, i never had. I guess they had a couple of big hits in Europe around about 1972 or so, but their music never made it to this side of the pond. Not too many folks in the States have ever heard of them (Myself included.) He said he'd pick up a few of their 45s and send them my way... A couple weeks later, i'm the proud owner of some really far-out obscure early 70's British 'rock' music...
But every day, I try to think about what my role as a parent is, what my children need from me, and how I can provide it in the best way possible. Regardless of how you define what Unparenting is, it is safe to say that we all have an opportunity to improve so we can give our children the best part of ourselves.
It’s funny, my girls were pondering the little cards right along with me. I had to cut out some circles for them to decorate as well. Even Christopher got involved…he worked on finding me the ring to put the cards on and also did all the spraying of the finished cards with polyurethane so that they had a nice shiny top coat.
I also don’t feel that I’m qualified enough to handle the position. I feel I need guidance from an editor for a little while longer before I can become one.
With the experience and range of students in the course, these should be quite interesting workshops.
Flipping the Mind and alternative reality.
1. After dropping a roll of toilet paper in the toilet, I dried it out and reused it.
It is your rationale that is confusing. You exclude Jews based on words not present in fact or spirit in many variations of your definition. Your labeling me an “intellectual cripple” is unjustified, as is the assumption that I have a “lunatic obsession with Jews as the source of all evil”.
Okay so we didn’t go to Scotland but we went to a Scottish festival. I know that travel will more than likely be limited to the good old USA for my kids. So taking advantage of heritage festivals might be as close as they get to go somewhere foreign.
“Hold On“, “Release Me“, and “You’re in Love” all reached #1 on the Billboard Top-40 Charts.
Heresy Corner is a blog that regular points out what everyone is missing when it comes to almost any subject that finds itself in the public domain, linking to Sunny Hundal immediately made me fear the worst. If you were to metion Olly C and Sunny Hundal to me in the same breath, I would automatically assume that they were locking horns. Instead, I find that Sunny is behind the Bexley One on this.
Duration : 2hr 39min
Thatcher), a crafty and devious man who, once
It is not so much a question of whether what he is charged with is considered financial fraud. The fraud is what was perpetuated upon a nation seeking a leader pretending to be something far less than was portrayed.
You sent your breath and it formed them, *
Juicy texture with rich black fruit, especially cassis, as well as some cherry notes creeping in giving it acidity and keeping it fresh and lively. The finish is rich with supple fruit and savoury spices.
Sunday: Leftovers
I think I will keep him, except I am going to glue his mouth shut. FOREVER. He has no right to talkback because it is his JOB to serve us.
The big weekends for visits during the year are Parents Weekend, Homecoming, Corps Day Weekend and Graduation Weekend. You can learn about the history of each on the web site. Learn the traditions of the school: Alma Mater, Cadet Prayer, Citadel Code, Knob Knowledge, The Ring.
This is really where the problem lies, in my opinion. If everyone ate at least 5 serves of vegetables a day, you’d be fine and dandy. The Australian government have actually done a great job with their ‘Go for 2 and 5 campaign’ – 2 serves of fruit and 5 serves of vegetables a day.
(I actually played Laurie Berkner and it was as lame as it sounds)
Um, well, “rotting” and “animate” could be like a zombie thing, right? Like, re-animated rotting flesh? What about some kind of a zombie poem?
You might be spoilin’ me too much, love
Since the shoes I had on that morning were not all that comfortable, I decided to go in.
The training has begun! We started out with a 25 mile ride around phoenix on Saturday the 7th, and on Sunday we did a 30 mile day. Our average rides on the trip will be about 75 miles, ranging from 65 in the Rockies to 100+ in Kansas. We have another training day planned for tomorrow and our slowly getting in long distance shape!
Stitching Lucie Beharel's little sampler was very enjoyable. And although she stitched hers in Honfleur, this sampler reminds me of Rome. The cross flanked by candlesticks and flowers reminds me of St. Peter's. When I took her photo, I included the rosary I brought home from St. Peter's. It's been tucked safely away in its little bag since then, but this piece looked like it was the perfect opportunity for a photo shoot with it!
Love, love, mercy and love
this is a cute shoujo and i can completely relate to the main character so i absolutely love it
"grizzly king," - Yes, including the coma. It's good to know I'm not the only one who occasionally adds unwanted characters into her searches.
Mom Mom truly had a servant heart. She always put everyone else’s needs before hers. Whether it was helping someone in need, baking a cake or cookies, driving friends and family around. A few weeks ago, my daughter Madison and I visited with her. She was in a lot of pain from the cancer, her body was beaten down from the chemotherapy, but she lit up when we came into the room. She instantly started offering us food and drink and anything else we might want or need. My mom was making lunch for her and making sure that she ate. I was watching her from the dining room as she asked Pop Pop, “did she eat?” referring to my Mom. That was Mom Mom. Even in the midst of her suffering, she was still caring for everyone else.
I hope this gives you some ideas for picking a portfolio. Later this week I will start showing new items for 2012, and next week I will finish the information on portfolios. Have a great week!
how grateful they are for their trials.
Make the smallest distinction, however
I then cut around the edges of the flouirshes. It is ok if they are not perfect, as all of the edges will be filed. I use three files. Two are regular nail files & the third (grey) file is a distress file that I picked up at a local scrapbook store. I still find I use the small emery board more than any of them.
Nevertheless, the recipes themselves did not disappoint!
We're holding the sale of Enfa-related products for now as there are some changes w/ new formula, packaging and price. We're not sure of the new price yet, but we'll try to provide you cheaper prices whenever possible as we want all EasyBebe customers to be happy.
Military leaders and national security experts – from Republican and Democratic Administrations alike –have consistently called for robust funding of the State Department, USAID, and other civilian-led agencies. Secretary of Defense Panetta and Former Secretary of Defense Gates have spoken of how vital our civilian tools are to national security and lamented that these programs were not more adequately funded and resourced. Secretary Panetta recently said, “Strong national security is dependent on having a strong diplomatic arm, a strong development arm, a strong intelligence arm, a strong capability to try to have strong economies in the world.” And a recent survey shows that ninety percent of active duty and retired military officers believe that a strong military alone is not enough to protect America and that we must use the tools of development and diplomacy to achieve our national security objectives.
It's not about telling people exactly how to do things, but rather letting them know what the expectations are so that everyone is on the same page. In loosely structured groups where specific guidelines aren't given, you tend to get a broad spectrum of quality. Some people will knock themselves out with lots of laminated visuals and hours of research and others will print some outline off the internet the night before with a 1-inch fuzzy picture. It isn't really fair for either participant and the person who did little work will feel guilty, while the ones who put in hours and hours of work will feel gypped. Guilty or gypped--neither is great for repeat participation or happy members.
“No such complaints have been lodged, to my knowledge.”
At any rate, depending on the recipe there can be a lot of tweaking. Luckily my fears in the kitchen are few and seem to be limited to meat and fish. I have no idea where this fear came from since I was raised in a meat and fish loving family but, there it is and I’m in no hurry to change that especially after watching Forks Over Knives.
A ghost by action, not spectral but just unseen
Many women have equally busy nights. But, unfortunately, sometimes some women don't and they might only have a couple of tandas (or, tango gods forbid--none). It's this situation I want to talk about.
Here are five problems that can occur during an interview, and how to deal with them.
Post 134 of 180
On a bad pain day, I don't realise until I find myself crying because I've run out of milk or when my kids spill a drink. I'm "fine"
A few miles after passing through the Kluane National Park area, we crossed the border once again from the Yukon Territory to Alaska, and now we were back in the USA. Interestingly, the road was much better - I'm not sure what American engineers do that Canadians don't, but there is a definite difference.
NO BULL PREMISE: Journalist and outdoorsy type Jon Krakauer investigates the mysterious arctic death of Chris McCandless, a well-off twentysomething from the US east coast.
"Taking a human bride is pointless. They will never reach our level of understanding. Why do we have to continually be punished for the mistakes of the ancients?"
It charged straight at a constable, leading to what can only be described as a fight between the two. It was really angry.
Day two of in-season testing completes in Mugello. The beautiful green rolling hills provided a spectacular back drop to for the Formula One tests. It was business as usual for the teams present. Running through their programs and ticking off their “To Do” list.
You and your party are standing on a stone outcropping jutting out over a hole deep like the Grand Canyon. You notice three grey, legless things climbing silently but deftly towards you. They are fifty feet below. There is a rickety wooden elevator you rode down in, another rickety elevator going down farther, and a door into the cliff face. The door's inset handle has two inscriptions. One on the left, one on the right.
Kathy told me of an amazing mystery. The library had some books that were overdue and tried to reach the patron by sending a letter. The letter came back from the post office marked "deceased." Instead of just writing it off, the librarians began asking selected patrons if they had seen this
This is the first time I'm showing it to you, but the third time I'm wearing it.
Hob Centering
We’ve got some joy in this
The full MV is expected to be released in no time!
She smiled as he took her hand.
What happens when the Great Emancipator is suddenly freed from the bonds of time to right wrongs throughout history? On the night of his assassination, Abraham Lincoln's life is threatened not by an angry actor, but by Void Stalin, the man who is literally the greatest villain of all time!
I remembered how criminally effortless it is for me, for most people, to make myself breakfast in the morning, to grudgingly pay my bills, to call my Mom. It's not like that for him.
included patterns for dolls and toys, bazaar items,
This is where I caught up with other living legends who came to show love and support to Uncle Ralph. Many say Ralph McDaniels is “our” generation’s Don Cornelious and to me that’s a compliment yet he’s much more to us for what he’s contributed besides playing videos on the 1st real hip hop video show ever “Video Music Box.” He’s literally one of my inspirations for doing what I do today (my 1st real job was working at WNYC-TV 31, the original home to Video Music Box) in 1990 when conscious hip hop music and culture was at it’s peak level. Many don’t know that Ralph produced just about every X-Clan video with his partner Vic Kid directing them. Ralph also directed Wu-Tang’s very beginning “Protect Ya Neck, Method Man, Ice Cream” and Nas’ “It Ain’t Hard To Tell” plus that legendary Illmatic documentary, which played on Video Music Box over and over, which made us fall in love with the one they call Rapper Nas or Nasty Nas at the time. That’s is just a small tad itty bitty bit of what McDaniels has done for our hip hop community as a whole, just too much more to name here.
I hope you will tune in tomorrow to Green Bay Packers vs. the Giants! We will be needing your support through the next two games... because if the PACKERS WIN THE SUPERBOWL... YOU WILL GET THE SAME SALE THAT WE HAD LAST YEAR.. !! Our site has been moved since then to its own server... so you won't crash the site!
worked hard to keep. What’s familiar here?
Qualcast Suffolk Punch Cylinder Lawn Mowers
On my second trip to Cuba I decided to distribute them ourselves for fear of their being resold. Years later we managed to take our organization to other countries and we intend to continue our expansion.
*In other words, an alien from outer space. Please notice his nicely placed elbows on his plate. He's an awesome kid, with wonderfully creative ideas, like wanting to sell the rocks from Milford's Gulf Beach to the denizens of said Gulf Beach.
Since I was on a cutting spree, I thought I would cut some of the pieces needed for the current small quilt challenge on Kathleen Tracy's Yahoo Group "Small Quilt Talk". It's a darling little nine-patch and all I had to do was cut 2" squares from various lights and darks as well as four 5" light squares. There are some other pieces that have to be added, so they'll come together when I assemble the blocks.
No, I haven't disappeared off the face of the blogging planet. My time and energy has been swallowed up by a few days break, followed by (or actually started when away) another round of viruses and then ending recently in a creative slump. You know the kind - you think about creating but are sure no idea is worthy, that your skills are lacking anyway and subsequently become despondent. Suddenly the only creative activity you do is to invent extremely imaginative ways to procrastinate!! Sound familiar?
Thankfully she wasn't home when it happened.
So I am going to cover here the stuff that has the maximum bandwidth - the Initiatives and Resolutions that everyone is going to have to vote on in Washington State. For the rest, I point to the usual suspects - The Muni League, the Stranger, the various smaller blogs that cover this stuff, and the Washington State and King County Voters Guides. And the Seattle Times as well, with a larger than normal chunk of salt applied - They spent the past three months pointing out how fouled up the Seattle School Districts are, pointed out how incurious the school board is in the matter, then proceeded to endorse all the incumbents (because, yahknow, stability is more important than curiosity).
~This recipe is from The Homestyle Amish Kitchen Cookbook that I purchased at Lehman's. The photo is of the caramel popcorn I made. It is really delicious! I hope you will give the recipe a try and let me know how you liked it! :)
It is indeed more efficient. However, this also means that “Your Web search experience will reinforce whatever affiliations, interests, opinions, and biases you already possess. And it is fraught, Vaidhyanathan warns, with even more insidious implications:
What surprised me was how easy it was.
*real foodie
He was an awesome and Godly man. We know he has a place in heaven. He always tried to do the right thing. Together with my mother in law, they raised 4 kids into outstanding adults. Luckily, I got the best one! I'm sure my other in-laws would object but I know better! I love this 3 generation picture of him with Mr. Creative and our two sons!
Army Show booth, Washington; 5) STAR
The metronome stand... this was the real problem
Paige Sheridan has the perfect life. She's pretty, rich, and popular, and her spot on the homecoming court is practically guaranteed. But when a night of partying ends in an it-could-have-been-so-much worse crash , everything changes. Her best friends start ignoring her, her boyfriend grows cold and distant, and her once-adoring younger sister now views her with contempt. The only bright spot is
I intended to create a clear explanation of how I view the 365 designs posted to this project and how I'd feel if someone took this free information, condensed it, edited it, and put it in a book. I would have no problem with this because it would require an extreme amount of work, and effort, and honestly, I haven't had the time to make it happen.
There are some who regard his tight grip on the country's purse strings as anti-developmental and uncaring to the poor. This is despite figures showing that he has committed more money to the poor, education and health since taking over as finance minister in 1996.
Busy week here. I will be taking a nice long vacation in May and have been trying to work ahead a bit. I will schedule some posts to go live while I'm gone so you won't miss out on any craftiness. Today's post is to announce the new Technique Challenge with Blockheads Paper Arts. This month, Colleen has chosen the Emboss Resist Technique and her step by step tutorial can be found on the Blockheads web page in the Technique section. Since Mother's Day is fast approaching, I used the mother and baby stamp from the Grunge Collage Half Sheet.
Clinical Fellow/Program Director
STELLA is our featured Space Walker this week. She is very excited to share her views about having iPads in the classroom this year. Due to personal illness, we were unable to post this yesterday, but she wanted it posted today. Take it away, Stella!
An illustration of how Lewin's theories currently shape research on genes can be traced to studies of intelligence. For years, researchers have been interested in how much of people’s intellectual capacity is a product of their genes, and studies have typically examined the impact of genes on the intelligence of twin pairs (who share between 50% and 100% of their genes).
- Rainbow Light Prenatal Petite Vitamin
I was in a bit of a hurry to get this area planted last year, because the guy who tilled said we needed to put in a retaining wall, or all of the dirt was going to wash out of the yard. I did some looking into it, and found that if we got it planted right away, it should be OK. Some of the plants, like iris, may end up not staying. I already moved the daylilies out of the area. Still, the iris looks like it will be color coordinated with the euphorbia. The little plant on the left is a dahlia that didn't get dug up, yet survived due to our mild winter.
According to Lianhe Zaobao, Colonel Yau made the shocking announcement on Monday in an Emergency Meeting to senior members of the NDP organizing committee. Colonel Tan Kok Ming will be taking over his position. It is not revealed if Colonel Yau is resigning from his positions in SAF as well.
destroyer of north’s dominion.
After gazing at the stars for a bit trying to contemplate the nearing of the end of the trip; we went to bed in our small but functional room with AC.
candidates are
I want to make enough to support myself. To support myself well. And to have money for retirement. I don’t want the reason that I am married to be because I can’t afford to be single.
which string along.
Artists for Humanity. This grassroots program in Boston helps kids get off the streets and into professional graphic design careers. Check it out, these guys rock (and they love copics!)
Baptism is one of those issues that can cause much contention and division amongst Believers. It means one thing to one denomination and something else to another. But one thing is clear, it was a fundamental rite practiced by Jesus and his disciples. It was not a Christian invention. It has been practiced since the days of Moses.
Heart of the Country is a modern retelling of the prodigal son, Faith and Luke have been living the fairytale life, Faith from a small southern town has gone from country farm girl to being a member of the Carraway family, a well to-do family living the high life in New York. When Luke gets in trouble with the law Faith has no idea how to respond and heads home after ten years of being out of contact.
They were among six friends celebrating the May 5 wedding of buddy Donald Salsbery. Hampe said the group, some of whom had just learned how to golf, had a few drinks at a nearby bar and joined Salsbery for the mid-afternoon golf outing at his request. Hampe said none of them was intoxicated.
Many times we blame others, and separate ourselves by using words like “them”, to protect ourselves from believing that the person’s situation that we are referring to is possible in our own lives. It is a kind of misogynistic denial.
Bray Wanderers 9/5 (Bwin); Draw 9/4 (Boylesports); Drogheda United 7/4 (Coral)
"Let us be lovers we'll marry our fortunes together"
Jake England, 19, and Alvin Watts, 32, were arrested at 1:47 a.m. Sunday, about 48 hours after police began discovering gunshot victims in a three-mile area of north Tulsa.
They went with songs to the battle, they were young,
Retired manager Keith Brown, of Selsdon in Surrey, has found a novel way of escaping family tension by building a four-storey pirate-themed cave in his garden which includes a bar, dance floor, electric drawbridge, crow's nest and working cannons. More
I found these in Farmers today.
The process I use in Audacity to widen the sound, usually consists of the following -
1 teaspoon water
She said, "Seriously? Wow. Mom, do it!"
He famously played Tinky Winky (the purple one) in the children’s television show Teletubbies but was equally famously fired for being too gay (which he isn’t) in the role and he is no stranger to the backstage world of television.
First, is the sense of connectedness. Corruption begins where a sense of belonging ends. Nobody tries to cheat their own family or people with whom they have a sense of belonging. So if we can extend the belongingness, corruption and greed will come down.
Greetings!
What appalling men's fashion blunders have you noticed lately?
It’s a horrific scene I will never forget; to see the terrible panic those young parents suffered in their attempt to protect and comfort their young son as they waited for aid to arrive. In later years, having experienced and understanding the joys of being a father myself, I can only imagine the horror and fear that they suddenly faced that awful, dreadful day. I stayed nearby and watched as Michael was given first aid and rushed into the ambulance that transported him to Prince George’s General Hospital. With neighbors I would help gather pieces of his shattered and bent bicycle and saw small patches of bright, red blood-stained grass. Then, sick to my stomach and bewildered, I rode my bike home alone to an empty apartment, while my mother was away at work, and cried myself to sleep.
As a small boy, I was always fascinated at the sounds
So anyway, with graduation approaching I may get stressed out about deciding on a grad school, getting my first job, or choosing a place to live. That’s is OKAY.
I brought up the issue of my fear of ‘becomming my abuse’. the fear that because all i’ve know in relationships, both family relationships and romantic relationships is physical and emotional abuse.
Megg: The Cloud Prophet Trilogy is comprised of my first three novels: Anathema, Oubliette, and Severed. It follows the journey of Reychel, a simple slave who’s destined to be more than she believes she can be. Reychel must the decisions she believes are right – whether or not they lead her to her destiny.
Does it fit in my life?
i didn't sleep most of the night. i am not generally the type to get scared. but i was really scared. it was VERY cold. and in the silence, on the floor, all i could hear were the sounds of falling limbs and trees all around me. i was honestly freaked out. and hovering over Hlow trying to keep her warm and shield her from anything that may fall on the house.
And then when that dried, I sanded both drawer faces down to see if I liked either one of those looks. I didn't worry about getting an even coat of the grey above because I knew I planned on sanding to allow the blue to show back through.
They also love to gamble on the green.
GXOTW Blog (gxotwblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Maybe If I try harder,
So my thoughts have changed since then I guess.
We arrived at 3:00pm and went to our reserved table. We were with a group of about 20 or so people so it was pretty crazy. We get off the train and walk into an amusement park practically. There are all sorts of rides and little shops, games, etc. The beer “tents” were more like houses. They must take forever to build up. Then once inside, I was completely shocked. The band was playing and there were THOUSANDS of people smashing their giant mugs together and singing, swaying back and forth arm in arm, standing on the tables. Absolute nut-house! Of course majority of people are wearing the traditional clothing of lederhosen for men and dirndl for women. It felt like Halloween and everyone wore the same thing. All different colors and variations swamped the place. INCREDIBLE!
Here is what she sent to me.
Once you know the source, do not keep thinking about and reanalyzing it. Instead, plan on confronting it without being judgmental and then, confront it. Half the battle is won right there.
The objections against Nikola Ivanovski, former judge at the lower instance court, centre on the fact that he previously failed to be re-elected by the judicial council, which complained of poor work.
Jane Ashley paid tribute to her father via Twitter saying: “RIP Dad – my wonderful father, Jack Ashley, Lord Ashley of Stoke, who was so loved and inspired so many people.”
David Arnold is back to score his fourth straight Bond movie and once again he’s fantastic, too. He’s hamstrung a bit by the decision to not use the classic Bond theme until the end credits, but he co-wrote the title song, “You Know My Name” with Chris Cornell and uses an orchestrated version of the song throughout the film to serve as a substitute theme for Bond. It works extremely well and sounds reminiscent enough of the classic Bond theme that, unlike GOLDENEYE, you’re not constantly waiting for it to show up. It’s a great rock song, too, and the opening titles (designed by Daniel Kleinman) are spectacular. I love the colorful brightness of the sequence, which stand in contrast to the film’s muted (though well-lit) palette. Both song and title sequence are among the best in the franchise’s history.
Clapton’s next group, Blind Faith (1969), was composed of Cream drummer Ginger Baker, Steve Winwood of Traffic, and Ric Grech of Family, and yielded one LP and one arena-circuit tour. The supergroup debuted before 100,000 fans in London’s Hyde Park on 7 June 1969. They performed several dates in Scandinavia and began a sold-out American tour in July before their only album was released. The LP Blind Faith consisted of just six songs, one of them a 15-minute jam entitled “Do What You Like”. The album’s jacket image of a topless pubescent girl was deemed controversial in the United States and was replaced by a photograph of the band. Blind Faith dissolved after less than seven months.
Cd1: Never Walk Away; Like A Sunshower; Change For The Better; Wildest Dream; Faith In The Heartland; After All These Years; Where Did I Lose Your Love; What I Needed; What It Takes To Win; Turn Down The World Tonight; The Journey (Revelation).
The event started at around 10am with lots of children and adults coming to the venue of the event to be given food, drinks, water, clothes, shoes, bags and toys……all for FREE.
Last week I was ready to publish a nice 'boys in tights' post to show our latest discovery. Hamish spotted these beauties in H&M and was determined to have them. Aren't they boyishly pretty? I have to admit I am becoming more than a convert to boys tights. I think it's because they are just much more pictorial than girls tights. I would find it hard to resist tights with bears and foxes and racoons too if I was still a kid. As luck would have it we also spied some 'daddy-style' boxers in the same print.
GREASY THUG
"It's the obvious conclusion. That, or some piece of knowledge that would give us an edge. This used to be a research and development facility for someone-or-other, dealing with some pretty freaky physics." Again, Rissad tried to rise, and this time his gasp of pain was closer to a quiet scream. "Help me up?"
LOVE IT!! Sometimes I struggle with a sketch, but this one had me right from the start and I knew just how I wanted to tackle it. I flipped the sketch for my take. I also used a stamp set that we will be releasing later this month as a little sneak peak for you all......you seriously are going to love this set!! Here is my card.
Optimise Design – Denise O’Connor is an Architect and MD of Architecture and Interior design company Optimise Design, founded in 2007 with fellow architect Catherine Crowe. Optimise Design 65 Merrion Square, Dublin 2. (01) 6619020 www.optimise-design.com
When we starting out with the spanking thing at home, the canes soon got referred to as Klingon pain sticks, as my wife is a Trekkie. I have no interest in that TV franchise, but the name was a fun addition to our games.
Unfortunately the paper decided that the connection of certain serving Cllrs to such extremist organisations, was to be left out, omitting the last sentence of the letter.
My websites are wonderfully inviting. Look at this one:
Have fun with needle turn applique!
“That’s when their new flight feathers are coming in and they can’t fly,” said Edita Birnkrant, the New York Director of Friends of Animals. “They get them when they’re flightless. They pen them and they can’t fly away.”
Until Wednesday, the worst of the union attacks on King and his business came in the mid-eighties during the UAW strike at AP Parts. During a lull during the lengthy strike, King’s business was picketed by more than 50 IBEW picketers. This was at a time when he only had eight or nine employees. One of his employees, whose car was trashed by the union picketers, was also beaten up by IBEW thugs.
I was then sent to another specialist, in both room and person, for another attempt with the camera. But my body was having none of it.
Penny Pritzker, mother of subprime lenders, the woman whose bank was seized in 2001, the woman who owes the federal government nearly a half billion dollars, and just one more of Barack Obama’s dubious friends has turned down the opportunity to be Barack Obama’s Department of Commerce honcho. That was wise of her because I just don’t think, CNN and MSNBC aside, America was going to stand for an appointment of this character. I covered this idea here this morning. I just find it unbelievable that this woman’s name would even land in the hat for ANY appointment.
Loopstationpop and one of, if not the most original artist playing in Göteborg at the moment. Simply put, brilliant!
Like the Kool-Aid in your glass.
I’m also going to give my Slimming World diet a big push too now that the birthday month is over!
And I told him how much it meant to me to have him in the wings cheering me on when Brian went to boot camp, and when he deployed. How great it was for him to rally friends to send me notes of support, and how much I valued his friendship, and enjoyed his writing.
Protesters turned up early and in large numbers to object to Bartlett's particular brand of illiberal lunacy, to be treated to powerful speeches in front of the BBC cameras
It's tasty cold Too !
Positive thinking..helps us keep our focus on God.
And he says yes, each and every one is for sale, feel free to browse.
I’m going break my commentary down into two parts. The first is ABC, CBS, and The CW with NBC and Fox coming later this week. I’m not focusing on every show out there, just ones that I have something to say about. In most cases I watched something from them this year.
The vehicle’s driver and sole occupant died in the fiery crash.
Located at the foot of the Hochschwab Mountains, in Tragoess, Styria, Green Lake is one of the most bizarre natural phenomena in the world. During the cold winter months, this place is almost completely dry, and used as a country park where hikers love to come and spend some time away from urban chaos. But as soon as temperatures rise, the snow and ice covering the mountaintops begin to melt, and the water pours down, filling the basin below with crystal-clear water.
This is another song that I first became aware of thanks to Jacques the Kipper shoving it on a compilation C90 cassette tape way back in the days. I never got round to actually buying the thing, but I did pick up a second-hand copy the other day specifically for posting on the blog, which I originally did back in January 2010.
Short term support remains at the 1363 pivot and SPX 1340, with resistance at the 1372 and 1386 pivots. Short term momentum rose from quite oversold to just above neutral before dropping below. Normal action for a B wave. Short term OEW charts remain with a negative bias since SPX 1410 with the swing point now around 1381. Best to your trading!
I arrived during mid-afternoon and the place was packed with a good mixture of people of all ages - great to see. It was £5 for entry (with 1 pint included) and then £2 for a 'ticket' for a pint, so that would have helped getting people through the door, as would the fact that the Grand National was being shown on the TV. There must have been ~10 beers from Broughton (I missed the Dark Dunter, still to be tapped), 5-6 from Stewart (including the nice & cloudy Forth Mist wheat beer) and all of the great Knops Beers available - not a bad selection at all. James from Alechemy Brewing was working behind the bar and had brought along 2 of his own brand spanking new beers, which I had thought he might just do, and I was really, really happy to see them. The Alechemy beers were Cairnpapple IPA, an initially quite sweet golden ale with some citrus bitterness, but which perhaps needed a bit of additional aroma up-front, and Five Sisters (named after the 5 oil-shale 'bings' feature nearby), an amber ale with some malt and chocolate sweetness and then a real bitter hop kick at the end (from masses of Chinook hops) - this was really impressive. He's definitely not brewing 'brown, boring bitters' with both of his beers proving really popular & seeming likely to be among the first to run out (I came back for another Five Sisters later on).
One day a medium-sized box appeared at our door. It contained presents for the children from Uncle Skip. These presents were nestled on a bed of gleaming white styrofoam peanuts. I wasn't in when the box arrived. By the time the children and I got in, Grey had hidden the presents, but for some ungodly reason had left the box of peanuts on the front bench, within full range of the children. Quickly, after rifling through the packaging to make sure that everything had been removed, I placed the box outside, intending to discard the peanuts immediately Grey walked in the door. Helen didn't notice my acton and neither did Mason.
what if it's already begun....and you're just not really eager to catch up???
I noticed a really interesting thing while I was watching Sons of Anarchy though. We were thrust into the lives of these interesting, insane characters in this motorcycle club which obviously has a lot of history. Plenty of hints were dropped about the past, many of which caused me to turn to my husband who has already seen the first four seasons of the show and ask questions. Of course, he'd always shake his head at me and tell me to be patient. (And let me just say that gentle reprimand occurs a lot in our marriage!) So I kept waiting for the flashbacks, like the ones we got in Mad Men as Don Draper's secret history was revealed. But three seasons into the show and I've yet to get a single flashback.
Stay in tune with employees’ accomplishments and frustrations.
Next time, I'll only do a few kids with the marshmallows because it was kind of crazy in there with everyone trying to talk at the same time.
Step 5: Now your need to cut out strips in followingn measuremenst out of your beige fabrics. 2.5" x 5" and 2.5" x 8". We used more 5" long strips as 8" long strips, but that is as random as you want and as many as you want. If you use a roatry cutter than this is also an adult's job to keep fingers safe.
Beautiful Girls
The spokesperson for the ACLU said that prayer for Moslems is one of the five essentials of Islam as if that some how covers the obvious hypocrisy and remarkable double-standard put forth by the ACLU.
I should have practiced before I came; I hadn’t felt that tug on my abdomen in three years. If I had a sensei, someone, anyone that could have taught me how to master my extra ability of instantaneously transporting from one place to another, there would be no accidents. No horrible, tragic, fucked up accidents that would ruin my life forever and keep me from shifting every again. Until now. I knew I had to use it some day. I still should have practiced.
1 member
Munch! Munch!
Marvel is a company that needs to make money though, profit is of course a good thing. But often the actual stories being told in the comics feels like it’s the last priority. In fact, for the Clone Sage, the writing wasn’t even a priority at all, the marketing was. Which is how a six issue Spider-Man story spiraled out of control into one of the stupidest, longest lasting arcs that mainstream comics ever put out.
I fear not, which leads me to a final point.
We’ve told a story about visitors, about how people have approached the stones over the centuries, and what they have come away with. It’s not a story you often hear about, unless it’s to do with the exceptional – Druids, Travellers or archaeologists. We’re interested in the more everyday, the millions of visitors who have made Stonehenge what it is, a story about all of us. And there are some fascinating things in the show.
Please don’t think that I’ve hatched this plot because I’ve got it in for Hef. On the contrary, I have his best interests at heart. Hef, you see, is a man who has grown accustomed to making a gigantic anus of himself. The older he gets, the more anus-like he becomes. If he continues on his current path, he will be all anus and no cheeks. This will make him the terrestrial equivalent of a black hole, sucking passing bodies into his vortex and transporting them to the parallel universe inside The Playboy Mansion. Only by draining the anus of its cash supply will it be sapped of its lethal power, allowing Hef to live out his final years in dignity and peace.
This recipe includes what Dorie calls "the bread trick." A thick slice of bread is placed in the dutch oven under the chicken, so that it absorbs the chicken drippings and gets browned and crispy. Many who have reviewed this recipe have loved the bread, but alas I can not count myself in the number. Maybe my palate is not as refined as it should be for this to be considered a treat, as I didn't care for it even spread with the luscious creamy roast garlic or the tasty liver that was tucked inside my lovely organic bird. It was beautifully browned and crisp on the bottom, but soggy where the chicken lay on it. And it just didn't appeal to me. Sorry Dorie.
*On commuter rail, men behind me
So I framed it with these cute metal trinkets from Teresa Collins. It really closes in the photo and brings the eye right where it should be.
THE SPORTS BAR HOTTIE
Suddenly the woman across from us lurched forward and glared at me. “Can’t you just stop talking and read a book!”
While I've started to find more winners, I am not sure that I'd buy PB2 again. It's expensive and, after a week, I'm finding that a jar doesn't go very far. Like, I'm almost out. After a week. Boo!
But the big deal thingy that really got us the Chapter of the Month award was our fabulous Community Outreach Program (COP). COP provides low-cost training programs and large meeting facilitation services to non-profits in our community. Organizations that need help with training and developing their workforce, and just can’t afford it, get some of the training they need. Plus, our chapter volunteers who participate in COP get to design, develop and deliver the programs. Our own Kris Schaeffer has been managing the COP and the corps of volunteers for many years and was instrumental in gathering up the pounds (well, megabytes) of material required to make the Chapter of the Month submission. Kris, together with our Board member and National Liaison, John Darling, worked many hours compiling the materials to make the submission, and our chapter was selected. This unique and highly successful program has been, and will continue to be, of tremendous value to our members who volunteer in the COP, and the non-profits in our community who benefit from COP programs.
“You do fancy him, don’t you? What a strange, wonderful, repressed place this is.” (324, 1st ed.)
And therefore,
Your will. Your happiness – I am its slave
In the “what-to-see” chapter you will find that Szeged can be very interesting both at a cultural and at an entertainment level. Besides all the clubs and bars I’ve mentioned before, if you’d like to spend your day sightseeing, here are the most popular tourist attractions in Szeged. First off, is a place that has lately become the city’s symbol, the Szeged Dome and Dome’s Square. This is the place where the famous Open Air Plays Festival is held every summer since 1931. Among the most-visited churches there are: the 15th century Gothic Church of Grey Friars, the Minorite Church, and the Synagogue. There are also a few popular squares that most tourists like to see, for example Klauzal square , Tisza Lajos square, Dugonics square and Széchenyi square. Some other infamous buildings are the Water Tower and the Dömötör Tower, City Hall, Reök Palace, the National Theater, the Móra Ferenc Museum, Gróf Palace, the Black House (Museum of Currency) and the Pick Salami and Paprika Museum . Also, if the weather’s fine and you’d like to take a walk in a quiet place, you can do so on the bank of the Tisza river. On the contrary, if it’s raining or snowing and you’d like to relax someplace, go to Szeged Aquapark, which operates all year. There are plenty of slides and saunas you can try out, bathe in the curative waters or have a snack at the fast foods. You can also visit the Anna Bath, where you can also chill in the saunas, spas, and different natural and thermal water based pools. If you’d like a different kind of impression of the city, you can see Szeged from the air, all you need to do is go to the local airport, and you can go on different trips, which can offer you an exciting and original thrill and view of the beautiful city. For all those who like race cars, there’s also a go-kart lane in the city.
Round 2, I love even though I hate it. I used 10 pounds once again, a full five minutes of get-ups to push up to row to back down. I was in serious pain by the end, and I know I slowed down BUT did not need to do the modification! I always love it when I don’t need to do the modifcation.
I started yesterday evening, and I've only had a few hours to really work on it, and I'm going to start adding the left hand after my right hand confidently knows what it's doing, hah! But I'm pretty proud of where I've gotten so far! Not bad for never taking a piano lesson and my inability to read music. I'm learning it by ear with a little help from youtube.
My first memorable werewolf is Oz from Buffy the Vampire Slayer. Are there any werewolves in pop culture that influenced the history and depiction of your werewolves in Hemlock?
Banjul, Gambia – UNAIDS Country officer in The Gambia, Mr. Nuha Ceesay, on Thursday called for collective support to fight HIV and AIDS. He said universal access to HIV prevention, treatment, care and support was a dream that must be met ‘and we shall not relent until the day we are all collectively able to ensure that no one living with HIV is stigmatised, young people know how to protect themselves from infection and no infant is born with the virus’. “The commitment to Universal Access established a major milestone on the road toward the achievement of the Millennium Development Goals in 2015, especially the target under Goal 6 – but also the wider goals on poverty, education, gender equality, child mortality and maternal mortality,” Ceesay told a press briefing on Thursday. Speaking ahead the high level meeting on Universal Access to HIV prevention, treatment, care and support slated for New York, from 8-10 June, he told the gathering, organised by the Network of AIDS Services Organisation in The Gambia and funded by UNAIDS-The Gambia, that there were ongoing efforts and preparations at national, regional and global levels to draw attention to the high level meeting on Universal Access.
Yep, another great small space solution. Use furniture with legs so the eye can continue to move through to the wall. This definitely opens up a room and everything feels bigger and brighter.
And oh, man did I look cheesy
but at the root of it we don't know. & that makes every moment special & sweet.
The protest against the NATO Summit is being organized by the Coalition Against NATO/G8 War and Poverty Agenda (CANG8). The ANSWER Coalition, Occupy Chicago, Jesse Jackson, Chicago Teachers Union, National Nurses United, SEIU Healthcare Illinois and Indiana, SEIU Local 1, United Electrical Workers Western Region and many others have endorsed this important protest.
kind of like spitting- time and how to waste it; february 1996
It is Thursday when the grandchildren come for dinner and this will be a real treat for them. If you were making for adults I’d bump up the rum.
This being the time for reflection on the year past, I recoiled somewhat when I began to reflect on some of the crap we’ve had to deal with over the previous 12 months. Maybe one day, when I’m rich and famous and write my autobiography, you can find out all the things I haven’t blogged about this year. But not today.
Anybody could receive…
1949 further showcased Wertham critics from the professional ranks.
So Christmas rolled around & we knew that Spencer had to ask & hope that Santa Claus could find this specific request......luckily Santa pulled through as he always does. Spencer was ecstatic. Now any chance there is sun outside Spencer wants to ride his Spiderman bike. He loves it.
lunches:
I really should teach the trombone. I have this skill that has taken me a decade to perfect. Why shouldn’t I offer skype lessons? Let me know your thoughts on this concept!
Our work here, again, falls into the category of life skills, since Noah will need to differentiate between cans of vegetables in his activities of daily living. When to start working on those ADLs? There’s no time like the present!!!!
Regardless it will be really sad if she does end up leaving soon. She's the first horse I feel like I can actually claim that I trained since I took her from basically just having been sat on a few times and not knowing anything to being considered safe enough for a kid (although she has so much more to learn, sigh). And she's probably the sweetest mare I have ever met.
And way back on 20 May, a couple of us travelled to Astoria, OR, where the town was beginning the celebration of its bicentennial. We sailed the high seas (otherwise known as the bay and river area) on The Lady Washington, in a replica ship appropriate to 1811, while being regaled with nautical stories and songs and awed by the nimble dance of the crew as they dashed about manning such a vessel. If you have the chance, I highly recommend setting sail with this crew who, along with The Hawaiian Chieftain, sail up and down the West Coast.
Awful happenings in the news this week--therefore I'm posting about something completely frivolous.
Last Thursday I went to a walk-in clinic because I had been sick with a cold for two weeks and was worried it was tuning into pneumonia. And as an add on, I mentioned I had a 'floater' in my eye. The doctor said my cold was almost finished, but she was worried about the floater, and sent me to an ophthalmologist.
Key Lime Pie.
since it has been the means of procuring him (her nephew George) a dish of Tea.
or a hospital room,
I hate the leftist pedagogues in our schools and universities who teach our impressionable young that America is a bad place, run by racist, sexist, and homophobic bigots. I hate the peddlers of discredited ideologies who infiltrate our culture at every level.
of my lungs
Right now, I am enjoying a 5-day weekend. I took Thursday and Friday off and tomorrow is a national holiday for Easter. I have been on somewhat of a cleaning spree, making The Boyfriend a little nervous to be around me. I cleaned the house top to bottom, cleared out my book case and dvd collection, and tidied up the balcony.
1. in the 90's I had jumper that was the exact same color and fabric as that skirt. In fact, I'm pretty sure my mom had one, too.
Victory 4 Victims 10k - 4/15/12 - 59:08
Unions and labor regulation play a major role in assuring working conditions, but these are not without their own problems. There are hundreds of cases, from the California Prison unionmembers who earn more than Harvard graduates to railway workers retiring in their 40s and 50s. These abnormally high compensation packages impose a cost on consumers, other industries and the society in which they operate. In this article, I explore how a properly functioning safety net can guarantee labor standards, but at the same time reduce the burden on companies and society.
17 minutes - Great tackle from Gareth Barry there. He has his critics, but he always works so hard. Is trying so bad really? At least it shows that he’s interested. That can really mean a lot to some people. Or apparently not enough, like when I drove for four bloody hours to go visit your family, only to find they weren’t in because YOU got the dates wrong, you silly old moo, and all you did was moan as if it was my fault somehow.
The yarn, which is in reality far more purple than the picture shows, is Patons Classic Merino, worsted weight, 100% wool. The gloves were knit using 3.50 mm needles. All in all, they were a quick knit (four days total and I didn’t work on them every day) and they’ll be nice and toasty warm if winter ever decides to put in an appearance.
So, with all the computers, all the observations, all the long term data, NASA isn’t quite sure. See, it’s complicated
Loving Greetings, Leschek
That my soul had gathered some riches too?
I first came into contact with this film thanks to a high school social sciences class which required us to watch it. Imagine a roomful of rowdy teenage boys (ah, Catholic school), sarcastically skeptical that this movie had anything to offer them, only to find themselves entranced by the drama and laughing at the comedy within minutes. This movie is entertainment at its most fascinating, a brilliantly acted, unflaggingly witty whodunit that just may be the finest courtroom drama of them all.
In between the miserable togetherness, I had a string of hideously failed “relationships”. Let’s face it, they were just little flings. Some of the guys I really liked, unfortunately they didn’t feel the same way. Isn’t that how it always works? The one you want the most never wants you the most, too.
July has been a busy month, with a trip to Charney Manor ( my room was the window above the door to the left). It was a wonderful week spent in the company of about 30 SAS types.
“I need to get to the Sherim. I may not have much time. Sir.”
Ramon Marfori and Vicente Bonot for appellees.
Fill blender half way full with ice
RWG(EX ISO-Z) NEC
Sometime over last weekend, the Writer Beware blog passed the 20,000 subscriber mark!
The Commission tested a sample of 37 cars in an EMP simulation laboratory, with vehicle years ranging from 1986 through 2002. Automobiles of these vintages include extensive electronics and represent a significant portion of the vehicles on the road today.
Moore also happens to think that The Godfather is “one of the best movies ever made” and had a chance to watch it again when the film was aired extensively last week to mark the 40th anniversary of its premiere. Though a decade had passed since the last time Moore watched it, his recent viewing offered an unexpected reward. This time he found the film rife with teaching moments for CEOs running a business today.
I stayed 3 nights in the guest house within the large palace grounds, where the servants instructed me not to leave my shoes outside the door,
Since I got my sewing machine back, I've started working on the pages to hold all the postcards. This is my title page. I've blurred the title since it would give away too much about the direction I'm going.
I'm sure this is the kind of thing Jim will be having fun with in later issues.
ANYONE HAVE ANY ADVICE?
I did enjoy the film, but there were too many moments when it was impossible to get my grappling hook over the huge cliff face of this squad of National Treasures Doing Great British Acting.
To take care of at home
Several of the merry children, who had danced around the tree and taken such pleasure in it at Christmas, were playing in the courtyard. One of the youngest seized upon it and tore off the tinsel star.
Firstly, we must congratulate the Winner of last weeks Challenge, and the Winner was (drum roll) ------ Catherine (Number 13) well done your entry was lovely. As were all of you entries, I hope that you are going to stay with us if it was your first entry into our little Challenge, it would be fun to see you again.
we barely had minutes alone
I expected, however that America would always do good coffee. Alas no. It's by no means guaranteed.
Word; prosperity, and God – ideas are coming to me now and I’m making the right
Tapioca and Almond Milk Pudding
Ask most people what they think about the sun, and they’ll likely be confused by your question.
Bee Mask, Canzoni dal Laboratorio del Silenzio Cosmico
The openness of an old canning jar basket resting on a rusty aquarium base
Like what I've vowed to myself before, I hope I've brought laughters to your life.
So don’t over use subplots. Think about them carefully.
By this snow squall
i searched the internet; i browsed etsy shoppes.
Please add your card below
Preheat the oven to 200°C/180°fan and place 9 paper muffin cases in a muffin tin.
(don't give up, there is a point to all this rambling)
The sight is frightening as much as it is exhilarating. The ground passes beneath me so fast that a blink would make me miss a mile of travel. I can feel the pressure of strain on my temples back in my body, the tell tale sign that I’m growing weary. This has nothing to do with my magic, but the fact that it is late and I slept horribly the past few nights.
EXPERIMENT BEGIN!
This was showed in a report compiled by ‘Save the Children’ titled ‘A Life Free From Hunger: Tackling Child Malnutrition’. The launching ceremony of global nutrition advocacy strategy and report was held here on Wednesday at the National Library of Pakistan. The same advocacy strategy and report has also been launched in 24 other countries.
So I drive the 3 blocks over to Crosstown Station at 15something McGee (across the street from the Star's big green glass building). I was able to park meter free right across the street from the entrance. It didn't look like anyone was around as I walked up to the door. I tried to pull the door open and it was locked. Seriously, who's closed on a Wednesday. It wasn't even that early, like 4:30 or something. I was flummoxed, I had already decided I wanted a drink before I went home. Where should I go?
“Yes!” shouts the little girl. “Look Daddy, I made one.”
Here’s a brief summary of Staimler’s six use cases plus the advantages and disadvantages of each (see the full 2-part article for more in-depth information, registration needed):
(I guess it doesn't have to have that plastic part, but mine did).
awful ceramic masks, ghoul-
It says, “Let the high praises of God be in their mouth, and a two-edged sword in their hand, to execute vengeance.” It’s amazing, and not a little disturbing. It’s hard for me to stomach the thought of personally dealing out God’s judgment on the heathen. That’s unnerving.
When I had quit sweating and finished my cigarette, I packed up my equipment and carried it back upstairs to my apartment across the street. I sat down, sighed heavily, and popped open a beer to reflect on the day. Euphoria washed over me, but there still seemed to be something missing. What the hell, I thought as I picked up my guitar again; I’ll play a few more songs since I’m feeling alright. Even though my guitar was out of tune and my voice stung, I didn’t care. I had just finished my first public gig. I was the accomplished musician now.
Indian
And you? What are you feeling grateful for?
Worse, what Law doesn’t appreciate is that the sources in the NT itself are often independent of one another, so that we have independent evidence for many of the mundane, not to speak of the miraculous, events of Jesus’ life. It is precisely that multiple, early, independent attestation to many of the events of Jesus’ life that has persuaded historical scholars of the historicity of many of the events in the Gospel narratives. For example, we have references to Jesus’ burial in five independent sources and indications of the discovery of his empty tomb in no less than six independent sources, which is really quite extraordinary.
Z: You were drinking tequila at the time-
724 ***D-V/6/1976. “Human Nature and the Criminal Law.” Law Alumni Association, The Law School, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1979(7), above, pp. 715-29, and in Item B-5, above, pp. 375-88 (1992).)
If you would like a chance to win my Candy, please follow these 3 rules..
:: super sad that the first season of Once Upon A Time came to an end last night... Lauren and I have absolutely loved watching every episode together... what will we watch this summer
State: Sitting at a different cafe on the square in the morning, the rest of the boys are asleep.
The rainbow hid in the car
Starting from 1946, A. Kazantsev took up the study of the site, this time with much superior means. Like Kulik, he notices that, at the epicentre of the explosion, the trees situated close by have paradoxically remained upright, losing only their tops and their leaves, while those which were farther away, up to several kilometres, had been ripped up or at least lain on the ground. So this scholar was the first to formulate this unheard of hypothesis: the object in question did not disintegrate upon hitting the ground, but had exploded in altitude. This affirmation of course caused a sensation and immediately had detractors. Krinov, a reputed scholar, the Secretary of the Committee for Meteorite Studies, declared that the explosion had well and truly happened on the ground, and that if there were no traces of stony concretions, it was because the crater excavated by the meteorite had immediately filled with water.
Through this time, I feel that I have learned a lot. Just the other day, I learned that a group called ‘One Direction’ exists. You know that you are out of touch with the Tween market, when a group sells 5 million albums before you have even heard of them. I found this to be highly concerning. I could assume that One Direction would mean “to head upwards in a rapid fashion”. Then I wondered if “up” is actually a direction. I spent 168 hours in solitary confinement pondering this question, before reaching the conclusion that “up” isn’t a direction. Fearing that this would reveal my rigid thinking, I immediately bought a compass, walked due North for 14 days. Finding nothing of note except a guy claiming to be a descendent of Genghis Khan, I walked due South for 14 more days, and downloaded ‘One Direction’s’ entire back catalogue (2 songs) from iTunes.
I mean I am sure I could come up with a list of a dozen very well known female gold diggers. But to try to generalize from that sample to ALL women would be silly. And frankly miss the aspirational point of what I love and admire about women, ones in my life and the ones in public life who I pay attention to.
I wrote that post in response to a question on Author’s Blogs, a directory for . . . ta da . . . author’s blogs. I had to categorize myself as “published writer” or “aspiring writer”, and since I wasn’t published, I could only choose aspiring writer. Here I am, a year and 179 blog posts later, still aspiring to be a published writer. I am closer today than I was a year ago, or if not closer, at least readier to take on the job of self-promotion when the need arises. And I am still trying to perfect those books.
Asked to give her department's latest estimate of the number of people illegally living and working in South Africa, she replied: "I don't know. If somebody's here illegally, how do I know they are here? I do not know, that's an honest answer."
Today morning involved a 5 am drive to drop one of my cousins off at the airport (so much negotiating for a 30 minute drive :-/ ).
Needless suffering helps no one. Challenges well met carry us forwards. Caring is the one thing most likely to open you to pain, and the one thing most likely to ultimately save you from it. And Druidry, is knowing this and doing something with it. The something, of course, is always going to be down to the individual to decide.
Take a trip over to Norske interior to find an array of norwegian interior design blogs. Most of them are written in Norwegian, but the pictures are great for inspiration.
Blast from the Past
Sometimes V. falls down, scrapes her knee, and doesn’t even blink. But she’s still a princess, a sensitive flower. She looks so pretty in a summer dress, even though she’s gonna be covered with chocolate and glue and mud in twenty minutes.
It’s hard to believe that Georgetown Art in the Square is only a little over one week away. We’re excited to be bringing this festival to the historic town square for the third year. There couldn’t be a more perfect setting for an art festival; if you haven’t spent an afternoon in Georgetown, next weekend will be the perfect time to do it! The historic buildings provide the perfect backdrop for fabulous art. This year’s line-up of artists includes Mark Coyle, featured artist in 2010 at the Poppy Festival; and Sheryl McDonald, this year’s featured artist at The Shops at La Cantera Art Festival.
2) Joel hasn't been offered a salary starting at $1,000,000 like I had secretly hoped. With my secret plan, we would have paid off his loans, our mortgage, adopted several babies from Ethiopia, taken our new family of 12 on a cruise to Alaska, and then Joel and I would have taken a couples retreat, just the two of us, to an all-inclusive resort on the French Riviera.
Promising same satisfaction.
Many commenters from the UK expressed relief that a French jurist would uphold national standards, wishing that British judges would act in similar ways.
The panel completed its six-month tenure and submitted its findings to Parliament last week but the opposition and civil society have criticised it for lacking specific recommendations on how to clean up the voter registrar.
So what are some things that we should be questioning right now?
Wei’s chopper lifted off the ground and spun in the direction of the Rangers.
I went to get some new cosmetics today at Donki.(Please don't ask me how many times I go there...??lol) I will update about those things soon.
Before boarding the ship, we were handed 5 tickets, each representing one sample of the beer available on board. We were also given a slip of paper. The Amazing Taste isn't just for tasting beers - you also get to compete for sweet prizes like a $150 gift certificate to the Buckeye Beer Engine. Being a competitive person, it was hard to decide which to tackle first - the beers or the scavenger hunt. Lucky for me, they were relatively intertwined.
Anal is not, has never been and will never be one of my hot buttons.
What about Deputy first Minister Martin McGuinness of Sinn Fein /IRA?
In a medium heavy skillet, heat butter over medium to medium high and add morels. Sauté until they release their liquid and are just slightly softened, then remove to a glass bowl and set aside.
Not that I'll stop canning - oh no, I still have plans for a pressure canner for all those peppers - but now I can bring my stress level down a notch and maybe fend of the end of season Psycho Wife Shitstorm that occurs when I realize I have exactly 1 free hour on the weekend during which I need to can many tens of pounds of tomatoes.
Musical highlight of the month though goes to Fairport Convention at the Queen's Hall in Edinburgh (with Kieran Goss again - he supported Eddi Reader there last year). The Queens Hall have their own Youtube channel so there's a bit of Fairport from the very concert we were at here.
19. 54 46 was my number
I was struggling to keep my youngest in the preschool church program because of his behavior. He was adopted. His birth mother, bless her heart, was a drug addict. He has multiple diagnosis, including high functioning Autism. He looks, and for the most part acts, like a normal 5 year old boy. He is the most stressful little person I have ever known. Through each new sleepless night and fits of rage there shines a rainbow of radiant light though.
In Solidarity you start with a $75, three-month loan and go up from there. The loan officer records all the transactions by hand in a notebook. Every year all loan officer’s ledgers are audited by an outside auditor.
A figure woven of the finest air
ISBN-13: 978-0-06-166242-3
She added that the plan for the gathering did not allow for politicians to speak.
Jonathan R. Hohmann, 48, New York, N.Y.
D'Lish Original: 11
Our nations are the homes in which freedom and democracy prospers. This is true for the Netherlands. This is true for America. This is true for Israel.
A few more things about Brycen:
Look, it still functions as a real card too! Is it too much? Too weird? Too shiny? LOL Hope you enjoyed another one of my egg-cellent card. Sorry, couldn't resist. ^__^ Have a great week and happy crafting!
Now a child so treated would find society its saviour.
The Moocher Shops Incognito At Target ~ Or Who The Hell Are They Kidding?
... simply...
Now, of course, I’m a mature adult, living far enough north to at least experience some seasonal changes, and I still say I hate the heat – I hate it, I hate it, I hate it! It’s stupid and it’s gross. You get all sweaty and stinky and, worst of all, extremely irritable.
Next ask the universe or God (or whatever name you want to use) what is the lesson you’re supposed to be learning from these incidents. And just listen for 15 minutes. If you are attuned to universe it should come pretty quickly…although if you get nothing don’t be discouraged, the answer may come in the next day or even subconsciously…just trust that the answer will come. And if you listen, odds are the problem that keeps happening will disappear.
13. Elis – Anger
as you can see this was made for a special person! As time is very short for a while I've had to combine a few events and this was made for my lovely blogging buddy Sue who has just turned 50!
That's not entirely true. Cham had a rough night last night. She woke up twice and ended up snuggled tight in our bed with us. She's got 4 molars coming in at once, and what looks like 2 bottom teeth as well, for good measure. She's having quite the time with these beasts, often calling out, "Mecine, mouf" = translate= "Medicine for my mouth". It's so pitiful. So, this morning we were both groggy and I opted for milk and sesame street instead of a real breakfast and playing outside in our 70 degree weather. (It's December, remember? What is this, Santa Barbara?) So we snuggled up and sang the ABC's a few times. Then she napped. As did I.
2. I like to shoot with out a doubt a full body shot as well as a portrait. As much as it is about the clothes it’s about the model to. I usually only do a back shot if there is a special detail about it. If I can tell from the front what the back is going to look like and it does I don’t bother with a photo.
And the prices where like in heaven!
So why it is that we as a college football watching crowd, or really as a society in general, have allowed the Bowl Championship Series to manipulate college football, and take advantage of the free talent at their disposal, is beyond me. It all started back in the late 90s. College teams had been complaining that simply having bowl games which pitted specific conferences against one another both unfairly putting good teams into unwatched bowls, but also did nothing to demonstrate who the best team in the country was*. Therefore, the BCS was created to give college football a National Championship game. However, what has happened is that we have now a huge money-making business for the BCS, that has almost nothing to do with college football or the universities, but instead has as its sole purpose to sell ad revenue and make huge profits off the NCAA and the free labor that comes out of it.
Beanie wanted a few pretty extra touches added on to the coop (she wasn’t a fan of it being brown) so I free-handed some tulips onto the nest box door. She approved.
He thought it was another Dodger jersey.
Working on these 13 sts, work 35 rows garter st. Cast off.
KG Where do you plan to go with your music?
And for someone easily distracted by sparkly things addiction can pose a problem! (so can depression unfortunately as you realise just how many beautiful interiors and cool DIY projects there are out there you will never have the time/money/motivation to re-create :-(
10. Who do I consider to be unlike me? Are their differences charming or alarming?
On the challenge offered by his play for the NT:” I know I am in an exposed position but someone's got to go in first and start doing something. If its the national its got to be about England today and that means new writing.”
The aroma of the sauce cooking quickly filled the kitchen. It smelled SO good! At the 8 hour mark, I checked it and found that it was easily pulled apart with a fork. I took it out, pulled it all apart, and put it back in the slow cooker and mixed it with the sauce. I cooked it on low for another 25 minutes.
suffocating all that I am.
It’s been predicted that in the next few years, towns and villages will stop picking up leaves, even those that are bagged and or left in piles by the curb; it’s costly and wasteful. Homeowners will be required to get mulching mowers and use the chopped-up leaves to fertilize their lawns and beds. Last year, I did a post with all the details. The trend, thankfully, is starting to catch on.
The absolute true nature of this statement travels directly to the core of me and makes my soul glow. The importance of our everyday contact with strangers as well as friends is unmatched by any other venture in our lives. Life is interaction. Our interaction with each other. We learn and grow in these moments. Our lives shape and shift every time we meet someone new. We gain goodness and endure sadness. We redefine ourselves according to who we are close to. Choice is the most powerful weapon we will ever possess and we make choices depending on how it will affect the people around us. We are ruled by our environments and the people who live within them. We are all a part of each other.
and a slash on each damned wrist
Grace: Design Team Coordinator
6. Limit your visits & dresses. I understand you need to try a number of gowns on before you decide, or that you may need to visit a few times to be 100% sure. But there comes a point where your visits are more regular than hot dinners. More than anything the more you try the more confusion builds, be brutal when eliminating dresses, be honest with yourself. Set a realistic time-frame for ordering; a favourite bride of mine said she wanted her decision made within 3 weeks, she spent the first browsing, the second eliminating and made her final decision in the third week – three appointments, perfect. You’ll only exhaust yourself and your consultant.
I don't even have a vision for all of them yet, but I feel SURE it will come.
Like, the coming attractions, like any future…
This prompted Mr Clifford Lee, the head of fixed income at DBS Bank, which has managed the lion’s share of the perpetuals launched this year, to suggest that other issuers might well follow in Genting’s footsteps in tapping on the broader retail investor base.
Lee Chong Wei did manage to beat Chen Long (both pictured) by the close score of 21-17, 21-18; however, the match itself was a tough one for Lee Chong Wei. In the first game, Lee Chong Wei dominated the first half of the game by leading 12-4, producing a lot of beautiful shots as usual. But Chen Long started to fight back. Trailing at 6-12, the Chinese played a very tight shot at the net, Lee were still able to return the shuttlecock, but it was too high and Chen just chopped it, Lee blocked the shuttlecock like in volleyball, but it was ruled a fault by the umpire. The combination of good cross-court net play and solid defence helped Chen to close the gap to 11-13. But Lee did all his best to stop Chen from going even further, he maintained a 2 or 3-point lead until the end of the first game and won 21-17.
My little one developed a sore, red, dribbly rash on her face over the last couple of weeks. Changing laundry detergent helped, but I also wanted something immediate to soothe her poor sore skin. I lamented to my child & community nurse last visit that several commercial potions and lotions I had tried hadn't worked. The only one with some short-term success was one containing "soothing oatmeal" along with several other chemicals. So she suggested just oatmeal. In the bath. *blink*. Just put it in a stocking and kind of swish it around, she said. Too embarrassed to ask if oatmeal was different to rolled oats, I toddled home.
A bunch of fun loving people who like to bake and share recipes get together, chow down on cookies then take lots of cookies home to hopefully share.
There’s no way we can say for sure. We can’t rely on the current administration. They appear busy trying to remove our court leaders that ordered the distribution of the biggest owned land in our history. It’s all politics. It has nothing to do with poverty. We’re being manipulated and lied to. Again.
I am a money magnet. I am comfortable with my finances. I am confident and strong.
impressed by the facilitators’ ability to strip away researchers’ preconceived ideas and send them “back to the drawing board to see what we could come up with as teams”.
run by the Ford family (Jesuit cohorts who supported the
I have joined the Google+ community, which does not allow nudity in its TOS agreement. I don't know if that applies to figurative artwork, but I know that my blog photos are saved automatically into a Picasa album, which will also be linked to the G+ account. I have set that account in G+ to be private, but there is a link in my profile on G+ that points to this blog, so just to be on the safe side, I've set it to "adult." I apologize for the inconvenience, I know it's an extra step to view the pictures here. I think the whole thing is pretty silly, none of my work is of a prurient nature, but I guess it's what I have to put up with to be involved in a free service.
Mine was full of family, music, super bowl, and birthday cake :) Not too shabby :)
My mind has been on 2010 for the last month beginning with booking our hotel room for son1's graduation in June from MIT. How can he be graduating from college already and be applying to PhD programs and interviewing for real life jobs that will not bring him back across the Rockies or even west of the Mississippi? My thoughts hadn't carried me to think this far into the future regarding the next convergence in his life. Wasn't it just yesterday we were picking out a blue plastic bucket for him to put celestial stickers on for his cubby in pre-school? I swear it was. Warp speed has a way of making it seem so.
The result, I predict, will be a humanitarian catastrophe that makes Somalia look like a picnic. It’s not surprising that the Egyptian mob might attack the Israeli embassy. The Egyptian street has nothing to do but rise up against perceived oppressors, because nothing good awaits them; and the desperation that will follow the collapse of the Arab “Spring” threatens every Middle Eastern regime, such that the rulers have to try to get out in front of the rage. But what will they actually do? The Egyptian military is hanging onto power by its fingernails. If it attacks Israel, it will lose, and generals will be hanged from lamp posts. The Syrian military is too busy killing protesters to attack Israel, or to assist Hezbollah in a confrontation with Israel.
We spent most of the day with my mom, who loved every minute of it. She has recovered from her bout with diverticulitis and enjoyed the hugs from her granddaughter and the licks and snuggling with the dog and the two pieces of her favorite ice cream cake. She is my role model for being a strong woman, and even at 97, she encourages me to speak out against injustice and work for change.
To put you in the picture, if you're not already aware of it, I am one of the people to whom the article applies. I have a malignant brain tumour; a deadly one, which by all medical histories, is not going to go away.
Have a lovely Sunday. A demain.
We wanted to get something special for little Carter's dedication
Before some of my politically correct correspondents write in to make the spurious claim that black men treat white women better, than white men do, I have to tell you that the statistics do not back you up.
the Way," Amazon announced Wednesday morning that all seven Harry Potter ebooks by J.K. Rowling will be available in the Kindle Owners' Lending Library as part of an "exclusive" license, starting June 19. Amazon tells PL the license runs "until at least 2014" and says the exclusivity means "this is the only licensing agreement of its kind for any retailer."The French, Italian, German and Spanish editions will all be available for borrowing in KOLL.
09 Music Must Change (6:47)
Steven wrapped a towel around her and I sat in the shower with her for a good five minutes, when the water started to run cold. I got Steven to carry Lou and the placenta in the salad bowl to the lounge room. I followed a minute later. Lou and I sat in front of the heater to get warm and then our birth team started arriving.
The panel by Liz Edelstein and Megan Frampton on self and trad publishing was very good. They were very honest and up front. Made me think I needed to get back into writing romance again. Of course a man really can’t write romance that women want to read because we view it very differently.
Below you will find some of the last few cards I've made this year, not for any particular challenges:
Let me take you where you let me, because leaving just upsets me
Nice. Still very mild, very much like a schwarzbier, but enough body and tannins to distinguish it. A good version of the style, and a very good beer.
I feel good that by posting my website JonesHavestFraudVictims.com that I was able to stop dozens of potential fraud victims who were smart enough to check the Internet before buying services. Yes, they have thanked me from saving them from the pain that so many of the Jones Harvest authors have suffered.
And, in VERY REAL LIFE:: BIRTHDAYS!
4 pieces bacon
It was such a silly thing that set off this new spate of grief. I washed our comforters, and as I was folding them and putting them in the zipper bags they came in, I thought how nice and fresh they will be when my lifemate and I get back together. Then it struck me – again – that he is gone. We’re not taking separate vacations, nor I am waiting for him to come home from the hospital, but apparently, somewhere in the back of my mind, that is what I believe.
new challenge on Thursday, March 29th!
However, Keuning and Olthuis needn't be worried about depleting the reader's interest. A remarkably stimulating read, Float! falls somewhere between design textbook, aquatic manifesto, and environmental exhortation to explore architecture's offshore future. Water-based urban redesign; public transportation over aquatic roadways; floating barge-farms (as well as floating prisons); maneuverable bridges; entire artificial archipelagoes: none of these are new ideas, but seeing them all in one place, in a crisply designed hardback, is an undeniable pleasure.
Simply Scrappin' Petal Party worth $19.95
And Domino’s Pizza has specials often in Japan. Currently they are offering a “Buy one get one free” deal if you pick up the pizza yourself (rather than getting it delivered).
I told her that I had lost hope that this relationship as salvagable, that I was skeptical about everything, that my love was dying. It was a very tough session, again. Hubby will see her by himself next Saturday. She thinks he has some things to say and I have been encouraging him to go by himself but we both kind of backed him into a corner about it.
16 Oz dstilled or boiled filtered water
So for the rest of the night the discussion was mostly beer related, we handed out a few free Pandazilla samples and I even got to check out the home brew kit upstairs. I can tell any collaborative brew with this guy would yield fairly mental results. Macerated in 'X', matured with 'Y' then possibly even blended with something else. All in all it was a great night.
Apologies for not posting this sooner. But as the saying goes, better late than never, right?
Then again, who knows?
The partnership represents the first team memorabilia deal for Panini Authentic, which previously had worked exclusively with professional athletes from every major sport including the NBA. The Dallas Mavericks’ game-worn jerseys, uniforms and Championship memorabilia will be available to collectors at Panini Authentic. Panini Authentic will implement the same authentication process it has used with the NBA’s biggest stars to ensure that every game-worn item adheres to Panini Authentic’s strict authentication and certification process.
“I went to my office and got my rates accounts and an aerial map of my land to show the people, but they would not budge. They are just taking my land, so I am going to court.”
My particular twist on the Ouija board demonstrates a very cool aspect of physics. What I do is use a “special planchette” which is a silvery disc of metal – the participant in the demonstration picks up this disc and waves it back & forth a few millimeters above the board while various eerie invocations are made. The result: the “spirits” of the board tug & pull on the disc – the more the user pushes & pulls the disc, the more the “spirits” react. In fact, one can even drop the disc and it will settle down onto the board slowly and gently as opposed to falling freely under the influence of gravity!!!
Fry french fries while steaks are cooking.
And they tell us, of His image is the master
Look at this bit from P Z Myers’ Pharyngula blog:
So, I hear it all take place in the seat directly behind me, because… why would it be far away? It has to be close to me. It has to be right there, in the back of my head, like the barrel of a hate-gun ready to blow hot anger directly into my gray-matter.
worked seven days straight
So this is a conventional film that takes the measure of a country's emotional temperature but not its individual citizens. The game scenes are skillfully done -- the sound of the body hits lets you know why rugby is an orthopedist's delight. CGI shots and other effects seamlessly fill the stands with thousands and convert contemporary South African locations back 14 years.
It’s not hard to work out the first betrayal. It’s the classic one: husband looks for a bit on the side because his wife isn’t fun anymore. Even before Eva corroborates what she suspects, it’s obvious. Eva, predictably, never sees it coming. She’s too preoccupied with her own job, running the house and taking care of their boy with super efficiency:
The point of all this nonsense is I'm working on a post, I really am, and I'll have it up (the post) within the next week. If you don't like book recaps, forget everything you just read. You may keep the photo, though, because I agree with Martha: I'm so damn cute.
Keep up the good work----stay the course.
Another story toon, Gael has recently restarted Children of Greyman on Elune. Super happy about this! I am not sure why her tabard is messed up in the Armory shot above. :/ The unfortunate part is I already have Sifaol and Aethelwulf in UR, and I have not come to any decisions on whether to move them so I can keep the “family” together. I am debating it heavily, but we shall see.
“We know that during REM sleep there is a sharp decrease in levels of norepinephrine, a brain chemical associated with stress. By reprocessing previous emotional experiences in this neuro-chemically safe environment of low norepinephrine during REM sleep, we wake up the next day, and those experiences have been softened in their emotional strength. We feel better about them, we feel we can cope. This study can help explain the mysteries of why these medications help some PTSD patients and their symptoms as well as their sleep. It may also unlock new treatment avenues regarding sleep and mental illness.”
And sorry for the long absence.
07 Section 25 - Looking From A HilltopBuy
even if nothing is heard.
Three-times British Prime Minister, Stanley Baldwin, on 24 May 1929, said: “…that each one of us, so far as in him lies, will strive to keep these islands a fit nursery for our race.”
I've been so busy the past few months with design team assignments that I hadn't given myself much freedom to create just for the sake of creating. I haven't had any spare time for that but I do now so I've been having fun browsing Pinterest and C.A.S.E.ing some of the fabulous cards I've pinned. Today's cards are C.A.S.E.d from Pinterest using scraps from that ever growing pile beside my paper trimmer.
... how it is that blogging has given me some much-needed confidence, and the nature of self-esteem.
There were roughly 10 ladies in attendance. I was told that some hadn’t shown up today due to trips or sick kids. I didn’t mind, and was very happy about the small group. It was intimate and I was able to relax more.
It contains a map showing the territories which were being farmed by the Boers: from the Olifants/Limpopo rivers in the north to below the Orange River in the South (Colesburg).
The gunman was described as a black male, 6 feet tall, about 180 pounds with black hair and brown eyes.
Promise Brides is a compilation of three historical. Promise of Tomorrow was a 2011 Carol Award Finalist and is set in Johnstown, PA during the terrible flood of May 1889.
...that my life feels complete again now that Pretty Little Liars is back on.
Author: E. L. James
Radical as Obama is, his worldview is not dissimilar from those of a long line of liberal presidential candidates, stretching back decades. In 1988, for example, Vice President George H. W. Bush said of his November opponent, Michael Dukakis: "He sees America as another pleasant country on the U.N. roll call, somewhere between Albania and Zimbabwe." Precisely the same could be said about Obama. The only significant difference is that Obama made it to the White House, and Dukakis didn't. This is why, two years ago in Standpoint magazine, I called Obama our first "post-American President," one unburdened by American exceptionalism.
Or maybe I’ve turned my back on him.
Have you heard of choosing ONE word as your mantra for the new year?
A worn and gray schooner where from I don’t know
Morning reading, afternoon reading, or night-time reading?
We stuck our fingers through the black wire openings, hoping Ophelia would smell something she liked and come closer to the cage walls so we could pet her. But she stayed put, interested but not quite sure enough to move from her safe spot. One of the women manning the adoption center said, "You can open the cage and pet her if you'd like." I carefully opened the latch and stuck my hand in, touching Ophelia's soft head and ears. The Geej concentrated on petting her side and back. Immediately, Ophelia began to purr and pushed her head into my hand, lunging into a half-roll upside down so that I could access her chin and neck. Her paws began to knead the air, a sign of comfort and bliss. I moved my hand away so The Geej could pet Ophelia's head too. She giggled with Ophelia's pushes into her small hands, saying, "She REALLY likes this, Mommy!" After a couple of minutes of communion with this blind cat, we closed the cage and stepped away to look at the other kittens and cats. She composed herself back in her hammock, listening and sniffing, her sewn-together eyelids on her beautiful face pointed in our direction.
"Despite the impact of the economic downturn, London has remained resilient. The employment rate has grown faster in London than anywhere else in the country. The capital continues to be the economic engine room of the nation, with Londoners generating around 22% of the UK’s economy (measured by gross value added). This has been driven not only by the large multinationals located here and our financial services, but also by London’s growing creative and digital industries, its small and medium enterprises, and its sole traders.
Something with Power had killed her.
The goal for me is moderation in everything. In 1999 I attended the Natural Gourmet Institute's chef training program. It was there that I studied health supportive cooking. We covered everything from preparing recipes for a mostly plant based diet, to selecting organic ingredients, and utilizing whole grains. I feel lucky that I have this knowledge and am able use my skills when preparing food for my family and friends.
I don’t spend a great deal of time talking about what I’m writing. I don’t feel the need to post the latest paragraph I’ve written. I also don’t post how many words per day I write. I’ve done sprints before, mostly during the NaNO month. It helped to kick-start my habit, but I have my own schedule for writing. I’ve had suggestions as to when is the best time to write, but really it’s a personal thing for each writer. I’m a night owl and I do my best work in the late evening. Early afternoon through late hours, I can totally rock it! When I’ve attempted the early morning hours, I’ve had to trash what I’ve written as incoherent nonsense. I applaud those who can work in the morning before the caffeine kicks in.
One woman in Newfoundland complained that the song, a song that had been played on Canadian radio for 25 years, used the word faggot. The council didn’t look at the context of the song, they didn’t look at the meaning, they just ruled that it used the word faggot and was therefore homophobic and was essentially banned on commercial radio in Canada.
that good works, which are the fruits of faith and follow after justification, cannot put away our sins and endure the severity of God's judgement, yet are they pleasing and acceptable to God in Christ, and do spring out necessarily of a true and lively faith, insomuch that by them a lively faith may be as evidently known as a tree discerned by the fruit.
Dear Heavenly Father! Thank You for my successful radio stations in Jesus Christ Mighty Name I give thanks! Amen!
The verdict: I'm still obsessed with this project. Most days, you can find me swiping 'stuff' that can be cut down to fit into the page protectors and taking photos that may make it into the album. Most evenings, you can find me on the living room floor surrounded by my supplies. I'd rather sit with my album and plan on upcoming additions than do most other projects right now. I'm okay with that.
Talk is cheap, and the USCCB and CCHD have always talked up a storm.
2 animated
Hope you like the two tags, I can't believe there are only 4 left! Then I will have to get back to my regular Christmas crafting. Nope, I haven't even made my Christmas cards yet! So many projects, too little time - same thing every year!
“The Avengers.”
HP: Thank you so much for spending some time with us! I really appreciate it! I can't wait to meet up with you at our August book signing in Seattle! Thanks again, HT!!!!!
05-29 Syracuse, NY – Wescott Theater
Is shows that you will stray
This documentary details the root causes of the systemic value disorders and detrimental symptoms caused by our current established system. This video presentation advocates a new socio-economic system, which is updated to present-day knowledge, featuring the life-long work of Social Engineer, Futurist, Inventor and Industrial Designer Jacque Fresco, which he calls a Resource-Based Economy.
I think this is a cute image which I coloured with Promarkers
I feel bad about them, too. In fact, like most females, I feel bad about lots of things.
Those advancing this view invariably cloud the issue by confusing the overall impact on society with the effect on individuals. Obviously, given the prevalence of alcohol in society, it is perhaps not surprising that more people in total experience harmful effects, and nobody is denying that, if consumed to excess, alcohol does you no good. But is it true that it is more dangerous on a proportionate basis? I really don’t think so. Indeed, when interviewed on the radio, Nutt refused to be drawn on whether the harm caused by ecstasy, proportionate to the number of users and the frequency of use, was less or more than that caused by alcohol, and indeed seemed to waffle and prevaricate on the issue.
- Watermelon, feta & olive salad
If you have children make it a habit to feed them a heaping portion of volunteerism regularly. I have worked with kids at a food warehouse packing boxes of food and at a soup kitchen. They are incredible workers and add joy to the process … They are a gift to the rest of us. There is no better nutrient than Vitamin V to help build kind, caring and aware adults.
The Cozy Chicks Kitchen by the Authors of the Cozy Chicks Blog
and that I am that kid. I am that kid.
Make a couple of slits in the skins of the bananas and lay them on a baking tray. Bake the bananas, in their skins, for 10 minutes (they will go black). Then remove them from the oven and leave them to cool slightly. Reduce the oven to 180C.
DH and I are going to go to Shipshewana tomorrow and will
Wow! What a good sport.
There is no super-hero who is the solution to the problem scenario presented in the novel. Instead, the solution becomes everyday, ordinary American citizens who chose to lawfully exercise their Second Amendment rights in order to defend themselves and their fellow citizens.
Not by power
with your favourite door hanger by midnight 4th November (UK time). Don't worry if you didn't have time to join in this time - please still vote as it is very much appreciated.
We’ve realized nationally and globally that if we first focus on bringing others to Christ, (meaning we restructure for Evangelism and local mission) then spiritual unity, membership loss, and finances will all be taken care of. With all due respect to other people’s views, no longer does the issue of human sexuality/homosexuality have its hand around the neck of General Conference’s time and energy. Praise God!
So what do you have to do??!!
Mrs. J
Exhibit C. (let me wax academic): "We".
Jack (Johnny 50million dollars Depp) is running around england, Barbossa is working for the Royal Crown, and Angelica (Cruz) is recruiting under Jack’s name. In a story that feels very forced, Jack is tricked to aid Angelica, Blackbeard’s Daughter, into looking for the fountain of youth on board the famous Queen Anne’s Revenge, Blackbeard’s ship. Jack is nothing more than a witty crew member with no real goal in the entire film. It’s almost like a reality T.V. show followed Jack around and this is what we see…a whole lot of nothing.
He loves being tickled, eating rice cereal, toys of any kind, mimicking "raspberry" noises from mommy and daddy, showers, holding drinking glasses, going to the Thai restaurant (the owner loves him!), sitting at the dinner table, and staring at the cat (she does not reciprocate those feelings).
Rogue Chipotle; Newport, Oregon, Newport, Oregon, Spice Ale, 5.5%
‘thank you,’ she said, finally smiling. ‘much better.’
Studies of folic acid deficiency caused by cancer chemotherapy indicate that some patients are at greater risk than others due to genetic variations in metabolism of the B vitamins. Further research is needed to determine the role of these genetic factors in vitamin deficiency states.
What is that you ask?
Leo has never been backward in coming forward about how he spends his money - he was one of the first TDs to itemise his expenditure on his website.
Seven chicken nuggets,
I have been on the lookout for inexpensive, yet cute design clothing stores in Jakarta. And I finally found one. It’s called Magnolia ! These tops are all from Magnolia. Each item here is between Rp. 69,000 (about $7) and Rp. 119,000 (about $12). Isn’t it bargain?
Despite these issues, I for one hope that festivals do not die out and hope that they may find the spirit that is dwindling. The magic that was Glastonbury in the 90’s may have gone, where Oasis and Blur fought for control and instead of spending 1/5 of your loan on a ticket one could just climb through a bush, but we as a generation can bring our ingenuity too. And by that I don’t mean Justin Bieber and a rise in unemployment, but bringing something new to the musical table. Music has forever changed and adapted to its society and, therefore, so must its festivals.
I don't usually win things, so I was pleasantly surprised to win two giveaways in short succession recently. On Carole's blog, she asked for help naming a painting. The suggestions she used to help her would win the suggesters (is that a word?) a small mixed media work. I love the soft colours in this painting, and Carole's characteristic circles. All I need now is a frame!
"This means that we have lost perhaps one-eighth of potential national output because of the crisis."
27. Ten Feet Tall and Bulletproof -- Travis Tritt
And what would an adventure about organising a birthday party for the Hulk be like?
The Happy Herbivore is an amazing cookbook that teaches us how to make delicious low-fat and fat-free vegan dishes. This is the type of cookbook that everyone needs from experienced vegans to recent converts because to put it simply, the recipes rock. There are no fancy ingredients needed, the time it takes to make these dishes is totally realistic and there are no added fats in any of the recipes, sounds pretty good, right?
- WALK !!!
So much has happened in the last month,back in March my DH left the building where he was working as a superintendent. We moved into his brother's house which he was renting.It's an older home but on July 1st we decided to buy it and do some renos. Well one thing led to another,we have,well my husband has,done so much work.
Have you got all this? We wish were we fooling around with two guys with a lot of bucks.
Mercury Brewing Company, Inc. Ipswich Oatmeal Stout
On the way out of the school, I kept hoping a car would hit either him or me (him preferably, I still had things to do), and then this would be nothing to worry about. Unfortunately, no such luck. I do not really remember what he did or said after that. I kind of just switched off.
Philippians 4:6-7Be anxious for nothing, but in everything by prayer and supplication, with thanksgiving, let your requests be made known to God; and the peace of God, which surpasses all understanding, will guard your hearts and minds through Christ Jesus. NKJV
This is just my experience with Original Moxie but for you it may be different. You may love the way your curl pattern appears; you might even have longer hair so the outcome may be VERY different. Don’t hesitate to still try it, It may work better for you!
Now I live three hours away and planing a trip to Charleston is akin to making a shuttle launch; everything has to be just right. How much do we have in the bank account? Is everyone feeling well? What needs to get done at home before we can leave? Is anything else scheduled? Where we going to stay? And god help me if I try to head down to do something that involves timing the tide and weather because, so far, it’s proven impossible.
This was met by several minutes of stony silence on my part, my heart and face set like flint.
I praise it for its dated 1970s fake teak casing, and slightly dangerous-looking wiring.
The opening sequence also plants in our mind the idea that silence will be key not just to the film’s form but also its content. And, as the story unfolds before us - in the classic, box-style aspect ratio (4:3) used in Hollywood silent films - we will see how silence crushes relationships, endangers dreams and leads almost inevitably to isolation and great despair. Silence is and is not golden. But what it most certainly is not is a gimmick. The film’s great success lies in the fine balance it strikes between joyously celebrating cinema’s past, and dramatically examining the lives of people who are disconnected from their dreams. This is why it feels modern – this is why it has had such huge cross-over appeal and won such critical acclaim. The film works because it transcends pastiche, and takes it subject seriously.
I've got one copy of Zodiac Felties to give away... and because it's a relatively small and light book I'm happy to post it internationally so anyone can enter. Hurrah!
Maguey Crema de Mezcal, made with St Germain, fresh lemon juice and
I always take the opportunity to mention Curtis when I can, and in an effort to "bond" with this family, I said Claudia had a brother who died as well. The grandma asked what his name was, and she said "Curtis is the brother who died. But he is in my heart. The brother who didn't die is Cole."
The Saturday panels have been well covered by Joe Gordon over on the FPI blog and they included a talk by artists John Higgins about his multi-media concept RazorJack, artists Nigel Dobbyn and Monty Nero's art workshops, the Hi-Ex Charity Auction with all proceeds going to Children 1st (the Scottish equivalent of the NSPCC) plus discussion panels on current British and Irish comics and an exploration of Celtic (Irish and Scottish) comics.
But bus driver David said his poorly pet only squatted because his back legs had collapsed – and he wasn’t pooing.
We idolized and memorialized Whitney Houston, yet looked the other way concerning her well known substance abuse and tumultuous life with singer Bobby Brown.
I think, It is summertime again, How did that happen?
HDUQV Blog (hduqvblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Sliding amongst Beauty.
RB drank 3 cups of milk this morning.
That was a terrible decision.
Lightly butter a 24cm round pie dish or tart pan. Roll the pastry between two pieces of lightly floured baking paper until you get a 30cm round. Line the prepared dish with the pastry leaving a 5cm border overhanging the sides of the dish. Set aside
your father Robert Woodworth Beggs attended this school. Bob was a very
Sex:
"Still Night, Still Light" finds the three ladies in a contemplative mood, musing on the emotional tolls of the touring lifestyle.
At this stage it is relevant to remind Catholics allover the world that obedience to the pope is not a primary virtue. The hierarchy of virtues starts with the three theological virtues of faith, hope and charity followed by the four cardinal virtues of justice, temperance, prudence and fortitude. Obedience is a derivative of the cardinal virtue of justice. Therefore it is far from ranking first in the hierarchy of virtues. Certain bishops do not wish to give the slightest impression that they are opposed to the holy father. I understand how they feel. It is evidently very unpleasant, if not very painful. I certainly do not like to be in opposition to the holy father, but I have no choice considering what is coming to us from Rome at present, which is in opposition to the Catholic doctrine and is unacceptable to Catholics.
8-Add Lemon juice if required ,garnish it with chopped cilantro and serve.
I'm not sure it was any good, but it's a start. I will get better at that.
Since I'm not going to be able to be at my son's class holiday party tomorrow, I was volunteered to make the card for his teacher from the kids. To keep it pretty holiday neutral, I chose a snowman and winter theme. My "go-to" snowman are drawn by Zlatoena- you can tell I love them because I have so many of them:))
I used Flourishes "City of David" stamp set stamped in Anna Griffin "Grey" ink. I colored the images with Tombows and Distress Inks, then cut out and popped up on popdots. They were placed on a sponged Spellbinders Large Ovals background and backed with a Spellbinders Labels 18. I used DCWV "Pearlized & Metallic" Luxury stack paper scored at 1/4 intervals for a textured background, matted with metallic brushed silver CS. I used the Spellbinder Classic Lace die for my border, I added pearls then used a dark gray grosgrain ribbon and a hat pin for my accessories.
Ø Have a valid State ID Card or Drivers License
Needless to say, it’s an interesting anime based off an interesting dating sim. While the story comes across as short and it could be more graphic. However, this aired on network TV in Japan. It’s risqué and many degrees of screwed up… and yet, I feel compelled to watch it multiple times.
· Works closely with DMS Team Lead and SME to ensure effective delivery of services to client.
BANKING ON AN INCREASE
Brian Matusz BAL M 20
BUT, I'm not just going to walk away, and in my quest to use as many homemade products as possible, I have decided that instead of spending money on nasty chemical full products, I would use homemade traps which have worked great for me in the past.
2. Pour into a microwave-safe dish and microwave for about 20 seconds, or until hot.
Once again, this sounds to Western ears like a reasoned call to effect “social justice”. It seems enlightened and progressive. The chattering classes cannot help but be delighted to hear it.
Over the course of two years, Dwek arranged to buy a kidney from the rabbis and hid $3 million in assets from creditors through the rabbis’ tax-exempt charitable organisations — all with the blessing of the FBI.
Glory to God in the Highest! May the Son of God live forevermore and be exalted in this weak and trembling heart!
6. Melvins - Inhumanity and Death
In spite of its size, the banyan tree was homely, if you know what I mean. If the grounds had not been wet from the rain, I would have snuggled up to the tree with a book. I had to be content with just hugging the tree and moving on to the Caves.
Back in their usual hangout,Brenda, Sasha and Parker chalk up Natalie's story as a prank Damon was pulling. Then Parker realizes that the manner of Damon's death was a recreation of an urban legend. At the same time, Natalie realizes that Michelle's murder was also similar to an urban legend. Parker tells her to call Killington, the ski resort Damon was going to for the weekend, which she does. The receptionist at the resort remembers a blond guy checking in, but can't verify that it was actually Damon.
“Ready already? Now who's a Hungry Henry!”
Aloo Kabli is an amazing hot and tangy combination made of potato and chana (Black gram) with the aroma of Green chili mixed with lemonjuice and fresh coriander leaves.
'Come on, you have to hurry up. It's only there for six minutes.'
As a seminarian, I didn’t understand the masterpiece for a long time, not being curious enough to ask about it. Too many other new experiences, as a first year man in the seminary, were occupying my thoughts. Finally, one day, I walked up to the painting and discovered the title on the bottom corner of the work: “Jesus Of Nazareth Is Passing By.”
Died June 21, 1895
If you are spending your whole paycheck before you even get it, you should look for some places where you can save. It’s hard to go whole hog. You may not be able to avoid going out for meals entirely. By eating out half as many times in a month as you normally would, you will save money while still getting to go out.
Problem 2: The “new” philosophy is wrong, because while it creates a false dichotomy between what keeps the game fresh and punishes “loyal” players.
“Let me-“ Addison tried to say something but the girl hung the phone up, the last thing she heard was the woman’s giggle. “Damn it.” She glared at the phone in her hand, calling the manor again.
afraid we would never find it again
KARACHI: The International Nurses Day and international Day of the Midwife would be marked on May 12.
The static and animated version are available for free:
In the next passage N- again sounds astoundingly ‘before his time’, as he derives from phenomenology, study of the history of science and the evolution of language, and his own ‘reasoning’ process many things that I believe would be supported by much of contemporary cognitive science as ‘fact’: ‘the good dumb will to “believe”, the lack of mistrust and patience…our sense learn only late, and never learn entirely, to be subtle, faithful , and cautious organs of cognition. Our eye finds it more comfortable to respond to a given stimulus by reproducing once more an image that it has produced many tiems before, instead of registering what id different and new in an impression. The latter would require more strength, more “morality”. Hearing something new is embarassing and difficut for the ear…When we hear another language we try involuntarily to form the sounds we hear into words that sound more familiar and more like home to us…Just as little as a reader today reads all of the individual words…rather he picks about five words at random out of twenty and “guesses” at the meaning…we make up the major part of the experience and can scarcely be forced not to contemplate some event as its “inventors”. All this means: basically and from time immemorial we are– accustomed to lying…one is much more of an artist than one knows.‘ For me, this is some a perfect expression of an impossible to fully appreciate lesson about what it is to be human. I think N- is right on the button here, and do not understand why so few others appear to spend much time thinking along these lines. How he discovered 100 years before cognitive and transactional psychology that we are more like the ‘artists’ of our perceptions than a homunculus in a Cartesian theater I don’t know, but I think that this is another place where N- has been spectacularly vindicated by subsequent examination of the human situation.
Byrds So you want to be a rock’n’roll star US
He shrugs aside his momentary irritation, stalks up to the front step of the home. It rises above him a good ten feet again, a long oaken log-woven house with a thatch-and-vine roof. The door is ajar, and darkness lurks within. No one has lit any candles, and for a moment Mesdan thinks nothing of it. After all, if all of them are sleeping it wouldn’t surprise him.
All my adult life I have, in particular, HATED IRONING! I am not a great one for ironing anyway - things have to look like a dish-rag to warrant the touch of the iron in this house and I have mastered a 'shake and fold' system that mostly cuts out the need for ironing - BUT something WEIRD has happened...
And hurt
And I'll hide the maid in a cypress tree,
This salad from Fine Cooking caught my eye, but I made a few changes. I used green leaf lettuce instead of frisée because seriously, who likes frisée? and I added the suggested shrimp to "make it a meal" because we're on the gulf coast of Texas, shrimp is a thing here. This and a loaf of garlic bread (mix minced garlic with softened butter and some salt, spread on a split loaf of so-called Italian bread, wrap in foil, 20 minutes or less at 350) made a lovely light dinner. Added bonus: squeeze the leftover grapefruit carcasses and drink the juice for breakfast the next day!
Wow. That little gem has had me thinking for days now. What exactly is my “reason why?” Why do I do what I do here? Beyond basic documentation, beyond simple journal style self-reflection, why do I write in this space four or five times a week? Why do I put myself on public display? Why do I offer myself up for judgment, when I know I am so deeply sensitive to it? This is the work of personal growth that Chris writes about and the work that I am doing every single day.
The Department now proposes that an independent review be available with respect to certain planning proposals. The independent review would arise in 2 circumstances:
Of course it will a Birthday Theme :) Easy to make a card and participate, right?
Babe, don’t stop moving give me every chance
BURSTING MICROSOFT'S BUBBLE: Software giant Microsoft on Friday agreed to pay $60 million to Burst.com Inc. to settle a patent-infringement suit alleging it had stolen Burst's technology for sending video and sound over the Internet, the two companies announced.
It’s a great honor to be the safe place for a child.
I don’t follow a schedule; I just blog as I’m inspired. I don’t think I’ve ever gone a week without posting at least once. I sometimes blog daily. It depends on the time available to me.
Instead we’ve seen Jamaica in that mode with Usain Bolt and Asafa Powell playing the roles of Batman & Robin. An act that we perfected over the years and need desperately to reproduce again. So the question today is – where’s our Robin? Tyson seems to have the Batman spot on lock – though if someone can rise up and put him into the #2 spot, I’ll take that too! But until then, who is going to be the guy that is will give us a shot at 2 medals in the 100 AND help take back the gold in the 4x1?
Carter had a momentary lapse of judgement when he'd passed the Church of St. Paul the Apostle on his way up Columbus Avenue. He couldn't figure if it was just from exhaustion, or the fact that his memory was going, but he'd walked right in through the front doors, crossed himself at the font, knelt at the altar, and prayed. For hours. Well beyond sunset.
I would recommend the East India Pale Ale or the Brown Ale from Brooklyn over this brew. It's not necessarily a bad beer, just not what I enjoy so much. Especially copmared to the Stone IPA and the Hazed and Infuzed we ended up drinking alongside this one.
Where were these saddos when French Connection came up with FCUK, or Brain's Faggots, or my late grandfather's favourite baccy "Digger's Shag"??
138. The gift & blessing of a life partner just over 2 years ago, to walk through trials with me, who has not walked away when my health declined more and who loves me more each day.
It is too easy to just say "Show up at Max's everyday for something good" or "Go to Metropolitan", so here are a few that I feel are a bit special (and some cost a little bit of money), but you should definitely consider them:
Happy B-Day America! Here we are again. Celebrating our Independence as a Nation.
In all my earnestness (and absolute dumbness), I took the hundred rupee note back from him and before I knew it he was asking for his stack of hundreds.
(MONROE, WA) — This is one of those almost unbelievable stories that, if it were the plot of a movie script, no one would buy it. The story seems too far out there. It is also a story of the failure – not to mention the gullibility – of many in the news business, the TV business and the book-publishing world to sniff out a phony.
As a matter of fact, Disney artists have always taken advantage of this principle. Most people probably assume automatically that the building is symmetric, with the north side much like the south, and practically all of the HM artwork encourages such a perception by depicting the house that way.
9 x 13 pan. In a bowl mix potatoes, olive oil, garlic, & soup mix
We watched the sunset. We heard the cock crow at day break and knew that, shortly, following a breakfast of freshly squeezed Florida orange juice, Fresh Fruit Salad, Cappucinos, French toast and croissants all would amble on board Endeaver and bid fond farewells. Gift Bags were presented and included Florida key lime pie
Though it’s insanely expensive, it’s definitely worth a look. Le Bon Marche is known for buying more out there, concept labels and pieces, so their collections of goods are much more cutting edge and artsy. In addition, the space was designed by Gustav Eiffel (of Eiffel Tower fame) and is an amazing building to walk around and explore. Balenciaga, an amazing French lingerie section, and a more smartly priced section with an outdoor cafe in the middle make this an excellent shopping experience. Plus for the foodies, there’s la Grande epicerie across the street that has an amazing selection of French and international food items.
The little boy who would spend the next few months fighting for life in a burn unit......
Of course I am not suggesting there will suddenly be a drought of children's books. There are always new writers and there are always people (me! here I am!) who want to write. But advances are going down, and I do worry children's writing might become something that only the people who sell shedloads or who are lucky enough to do because they are already wealthy are able to do.....
Thanks very much for accumulating these quotes. This is helpful. I’ve sometimes wondered myself whether there were several versions of “Auster’s First Law of MMRILS,” or just one Law with many variations. As I look over your collection, it’s clear to me that there is but one Law, and it’s simply this: that the more difficult or dangerous a minority or non-Western group actually is, the more favorably it is treated. This increasingly undeserved favorable treatment of an increasingly troublesome or misbehaving minority or non-Western group can take numerous forms, including celebrating the group, giving the group greater rights and privileges, covering up the group’s crimes and dysfunctions, attacking the group’s critics as racists, and blaming the group’s bad behavior on white racism.
To have a real good surf
Jim once said he was only a hitchhiker, sharing the "ride" with me for a short time. Starting in 1995, that ride stretched into six years and traveled through some of the more challenging passages of my life path. His encouragement and support truly helped me complete three difficult years of graduate school in an external degree program. Ultimately, when my life began to flourish he chose a single path. I missed him deeply. The companionship we often shared was a pleasure for me as was our shared love of so many activities. Jim and dogs spoke the same language. They were drawn to him, a friend to all dogs. In 1999 his dog Eve passed with her head in his lap as he sang her through her passage into death. While Jim helped many dogs enjoy their lives, he never again had a dog of his own.
This is not a pop at anybody/competition in particular by the way, quite a few people have done tweeted/Facebooked during these comps and I'm not even entirely convinced I haven't, but I've decided definitively I won't be doing so in future, I'm just airing my views and wondering what you think about my points both below and above?
i love Life of Pi. I may not recommend it outright, but it you are willing (and patient enough) to try, then by all means, read it.
Jamie is a difficult character to appreciate. So many times her actions are motivated by revenge. She has a personal connection to the defense attorney indicted for murder, but her wanting to be on the prosecution team has little to do with an objective search for justice. I actually felt more for the man on death row than for our DA. And, once you understand how he was involved in the murder that put him there, you might also. Only at the end, when Jamie’s world is tilted on its axis, did I begin to feel empathy for her.
to know a little about the products and the benefits that are
Well first (and yes, I should totally get paid for referring you to this), I want to say that before you continue reading (aka stop now) you go on youtube and look up Sungha Jung, who’s a kid from Korea who plays (that’s an understatement) the guitar. Just do it.
I am so thankful that I feel good and that the Cancer was in my breast rather than an actual “working” part of my body. I am praying for others and still trying to be a blessing to others just like before I was diagnosed with Cancer. I believe God has healed me and am thankful for this break I have from work. Life is precious and I am learning to focus on what’s most important--relationships with others. I am overwhelmed with all the prayers and encouragement I’ve received from friends, family, co-workers, church members, and bloggers.
“Well sir, I’m the designated driver for our celebration last night (current time - 11:00 a.m. EDT). Yasee, mom here’s getting shipped out to Iraq on Monday, and we just wanted to take her and the grandkid out for a piss-up to remember before she goes. Now the little tyke got a bit crazy and so now he’s back there sleepin’ off a bastard behind the eyes, not to mention he’s teething, which I gotta be honest with ya was giving him NO trouble last night if ya’ know what I mean (insert knowing wink). Now if it’s all the same to you I’ll take that ticket off your hands. We’re a little pressed for time as momma and the boy still gotta go get their matching tattoos before she heads over to the armory.”
My pal Titus and I were talking the other night...(talking hotrods and our professed love of all things Speed and Custom) and I mentioned I wanted to use a cherry 41 Ford Dash in the 32 5 window.
Feta Cheese With Maria Loi Greek Herb Vinaigrette
At a time when the artist was still honing his skills in perspective, anatomy and proportion using pen and pencil sketches, the watercolor was a bolt from the blue, although its muted tones are still a far cry from the exuberant and colorful oil paintings that characterized Van Gogh’s later works.
5. The discipline of struggle.
Currently JW Anderson for his design and structure of clothing. And because they're quite simple but effective. Also, Chris Bailey because he's from Yorkshire and the impact he has had on Burberry has been amazing.
With the outline of the week done, I want to tell you really how my trip to Ethiopia was. On our first full day at the care point and in the first rotation of stations, I was flapping my arms with the parachute when one of our other team members came up to me and said that our sponsor girl was at the care point station waiting to open her care package from us. I FINALLY got to meet Seada!!! As I walked over to where she was, I realized that she looked totally different from the picture I had. As I got to her I bent down and hugged her. Now I had a body for the picture on my refrigerator. We sat down with her and watched as she unpacked her care package. She was like a kid at Christmas and couldn’t get the items out quick enough. She took the picture out and looked at the picture and then at us. The smile on her face was huge. Another member of our mission team had someone make and donate dresses for the girls. We helped her put it on and her smile grew bigger. With her new dress on over her dirty and torn clothes, she was happy!! We moved on to our letter which someone translated for her. As I was sitting listening and watching her, the tears grew in my eyes. After she had the letter read to her, she went to Deanna for a hug. Then she came to me for one. We had pictures made and then more hugs. Then I had to go back and help with recreation and Deanna back to arts and crafts. But instead I had to go and sit on the porch and gather myself. I had known her for maybe five minutes and she felt like a daughter to me. As I went back to the rec. group, I now had this feeling this was going to be a good week. I played and grew close to all of them but there was a different connection with Seada. Every time she was in looking distance we would make eye contact and just smile at each other. Since she was our sponsor child, we got to go and see her house and her family. I had said before we went on this trip that I wasn’t sure I was ready to see that but our day had come to take our visit. As we were riding to her house, she was entertaining herself with balloons. She blew one up for me and her. Well, the van stopped outside this gate and we were there. The gate was a rusty piece of metal roofing and she opened it and it was like another village behind it. We walked down the path with little Seada leading the way. We reached this mud house and this woman came out with a smile on her face. We walked into this small room and sat on mats they used for beds. It was an 8’x8’ room. That is the size of my bathroom at home. We talked with her, Seada, and her older sister, with the help of a translator, for just several minutes. This was her house. Just this very small room with two mats on the floor, a raised bed and a small hutch with their belongings in it. She shares this room with her mother, a 15 year old sister and a 9 year old sister. Her father passed away sometime from sickness. They would use the front porch for their kitchen. Her mother didn’t have a job but would buy things at the market and resell them for her income. She was doing this to put food on the table. We told her mother that we love and pray for Seada and her family. Her mother told us that she was very grateful and gave them hope. When we were done talking, we went out on the porch and took some pictures with them. After the pictures were taken, I hugged all three of them. The hug with Seada was very emotional because I had this pain for her. I picked her up and just held onto her tight as I was telling her that I loved her so much. The emotions got the best of me and I had to get out of there. I pretty much ran back to the van and got in and just balled. Deanna took some more pictures of her house and then walked hand in hand with Seada out of the gate. I saw her face and just couldn’t imagine living like that. What I just saw is what I call Ethiopian reality. It makes me very grateful for what I have and what I take for granted.
Fishy smirks, "Hi Ted." He calls behind me, "Kate was just talking about you."
1 pose
185I view my crime, but kindle at the view,
So when we moved here, almost a year ago now, the first thing we did was replace them, fitting doors that hung snugly in their frames and kept private things private.
Yep, that's great advice. You could ask Tiger Woods or Elin Nordegren or Mark Sanford or Elizabeth Edwards, for that matter.
Robin Carpenter, Essex County Council’s heritage expert, said the current building was inspired by Essex architect George Sherrin and demolishing it would be a “huge loss” to the Fryerning Conservation Area.
Our grandfather had an acre set aside
Figure out how much you can save each month and write it down. Setting aside a small amount in the near term can go a long way to supplementing your income in the long run. Look at your cash flows and decide what discretionary spending you can eliminate – including from your writing budget — and how much you can save. If you stop buying what you don’t need, how much money will you have to grow?
But this was not Maya Angelou or Zora Neale Hurston or Toni Morrison. Not these authors Michael Baisden, Eric Jerome Dickey, and Omar Tyree among others, basically what I will refer to as Urban Fiction. They centered on the African American experience in the ghetto or hood as teens. OR successful adults getting caught up in dodgy, criminal world activities. When you think of all the sex, drugs and the overall general content of the novels, it makes you wonder why my parents allowed me to read this and did they know what was going on? The answer is yes and no. But these books were not just reading to me. They taught me about the world outside, sex, drugs, how men behave (none of these books got this subject right), society and how overall another perspective of the Black community.
I’m trying to recreate the enthusiasm for my work in progress by thinking around it – literally – producing serial ideas for more stories using the same characters. However, sexy new ideas don’t make something I’ve lived with for months look that appealing anymore. Bad marriage? Maybe. Bad writer – definately, I’ve abandoned my toddler for a new baby.
Bear in mind, though, that for every dollar, euro, pound, or yen that goes to the government, it’s one fewer that’s available to buy his latest book; to renovate a bathroom; to make a crowd-sourced startup investment; to pay for the kids’ tennis lessons; to donate to an organization of your own choosing; etc.
For sport, you turned towards your better half with a sudden motion. Instantaneously, from hard-learned habit, her hands flew up to cover her face. She knew the next step of that brutal dance. You gently moved her trembling hands out of the way and your powerful fist stroke her face full of tears.
We strongly encourage persons of all racial/ethnic backgrounds and abilities to apply.
The IPKat now wonders what the point was of the new form of Rule 141, if the ultimate aim was apparently to make such a requirement superfluous. Can anyone enlighten the, now quite puzzled, IPKat?
At an emergency meeting of the National Council on September 6, Azazi had said the country’s security outfits were caught unawares by the strategy introduced by Boko Haram sect. He also declared that terrorism had come to stay.
Sadly this gave no hint of the raging storm to come. Never, before this afternoon, have we been able to see the waves crashing on a headland some six miles away. The rising winds brought rain and lots of it. The walk to school this morning was a stroll, the walk home was a struggle, dark, wet and windy.
In case I haven't mentioned it like maybe 100 times the past few weeks, we are leaving for Florida later this week. I tried on the board shorts I normally wear over my swimsuit (that I cannot find) and they wouldn't even go over my fat butt!! Really?! We'll be swimsuit/board short shopping today. And possibly school clothes shopping... just to get a little ahead of the the game. School starts back August 25. And we have a ton of stuff going on the next few weeks.
I find the biggest challenge in my job is not having enough time. Time to get back to people as quickly as I would like. Trust me, writers who are waiting for submission responses, it does weigh on my mind. But I could work 24 hours a day and not get back to everyone as quickly as I would like.
Venue hosts are responsible for counting all items received at their respective events and reporting these numbers (attendance and donations) to Melanie within 48 hours of the close of the event. The details of the collection will be published live on www.twitterblanketdrive.co.za.
Against the earth’s sweet flowing breast:
We have been married for 4 years and half now but this habit hasn't changed and I hope it won't change. He is very kind and loving person and my love for him is growing bigger and bigger every day. I am so lucky. Even though I love him and appreciate him every day, I think days like valentine's day is great to remind our self about loves we have around us.
I dont remember when i stopped sleeping but it ties in with when my pdoc gave me the wrong prescription so now i have no access to seroquel and i can’t seem to get more pills off them. They call me, i miss the call, i call them they’re busy. On and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on on and on.
ATA Kidz ‘n Power partnered with the father of Anti-Bullying research Dr. Dan Olweus. This partnership enables the Kidz ‘n Power program to combines Olweus’s research with ATA’s well-known ability to empower kids at school and in life. This combination has allowed the ATA to be the first martial arts organization to utilize real data and information to guide their program.
You will pick them up at Will Call at the event.
Irene didn’t turn to see the boy on his knees, desperately trying to reassemble pieces of burger and place them back in their polystyrene trays. It was another person’s kindness that brought the hot embarrassed tears to his eyes as he finally sat back, acknowledging that he’d never be able to brush the dirt and grit from the fries lying scattered across the path.
Where you are now
The way I look at it...if I spruce up the master bath: #1 I will FINALLY enjoy it and #2 it will show nicely when our little home goes on the market. I really want to just reuse the elements but add a dash of color/character.
I’m feeling well prepared and ready!!!! My training sessions this week have been some of my best ever!!! I’ve been doing really well against the other white/yellow belts as well as the blue belts!!! The purple, brown, and black belts are still a pretty tough challenge(as they should be), but I’m even improving against them!!!
Off course I bought them and the first who would be in my way during the bidding would be have been killed. Luckily it wasn't necessary to kill anybody to get those home :-)
of Jesus Christ. I see what they are becoming, not as they are now! Gone is the
I encourage comments, good or bad!
I always try to ensure that the images used on the blog are properly credited to the appropriate sources. All images are the property of their respective owners and are used here under the Fair Use doctrine of US Copyright Law. If for any reason you would not like your images to appear on the blog, please simply send me an email and I will remove them promptly.
Snow, again. It’s, like, every frickin’ weekend. I’m not clearing it because the plow guy will just block me back in again. I swear he waits just out of sight. Bastard.
Intrigues and then dismays –
Monti – according to Bloomberg - is emerging as a game-changer in Europe's debt crisis, "as German Chancellor Angela Merkel tackles a domestic political crisis and French President Nicolas Sarkozy focuses on his re-election bid".
that? I loved the fact it was reminiscent of a latte and
MLK wanted a country where people were judged by the content of their character and not the color of their skin. While some folks have misconstrued that to mean he wanted people to be colorless and ignore color, what he meant was that being a minority should not truncate your opportunities. We have not gotten there yet. Look at the average white family’s assets and those of most minorities, look at the high school completion rate of males disaggregated according to race, look at who gets arrested, how they are sentenced and how long they serve. Look at who can still get a job coming out of prison and who cannot.
and i'm happy..
But the show has a while to go before it catches up to that - if it ever does. For the time being, we're left with the spectacle of seeing these watching these people squirm like ants under a magnifying glass in the summer sun - slowly going insane from the heat seeping in from every direction, chewing their own guts out with anxiety. The only people who can thrive in this environment are monsters and sociopaths, and the only way to survive is by becoming a monster or a sociopath.
“Ue kyang kyang! Wae? It’s not like you…” Junsu said.
These people just kept placing things in front of me. They were throwing keys, knives, old things, new things, and I couldn’t see all these things that were passing me.
I mean, since we were on the subject of creepy things…
Some of your eggs might break when you clean them. Sometimes this just happens but sometimes this is an indication that your hens might need a little more calcium in their diet. Just keep track of how often this happens and if it shows up often, go out and give your birds some more calcium in their feed.
I had to take a drug test to have my job; they should have to take one to get welfare. I’ve known tons of drug addicts on welfare.
The Café ~
all occur to test the limits of your soul.
Things I wanted to show you
I LEARN SOMETHING NEW EVERY DAY
I have seen the Boston Nov. 71 show circulating on dime, but neither of these. The
Totalitarianism, communism/socialism, nazism, fascism, theocracy or religious authoritarianism— these are all part and parcel of collectivism, a social, economic and political outlook that stresses human interdependence and the primacy of a collective, rather than the significance of individuals. On the other hand, individualism is the moral, social and political perspective that puts emphasis on human independence and the importance of self-reliance and liberty; it is the opposite of collectivism.
3. Tumblr contradicts itself when it says that they are “deeply committed to supporting and defending our users’ freedom of speech” while enforcing this policy.
Picture frames up.
In my opinion if someone wears something and they look confident in it they look better than someone who is wearing something just because fashion magazines consider it fashionable. Fashion to me is how you style it, not how someone else thinks it should be styled. I would much rather stand out than fit it and follow the crowd
Although Jeremy knows little about city life, and even less about survival, he learns quickly. These lessons in survival sometimes come from the swell of friends Jeremy meets along his journey; many other times, he learns these lessons alone, at great emotional and physical cost.
I missed “x” days in my journal so I will write about it now.
Is little room for things worn out:
My next stop was to Sylvia’s house. I found her family living in a tent city in her neighborhood. I was greeted by big hugs and warm smiles as they informed me that her son that was missing as of Wednesday morning was finally found alive. He had hurt one his legs pretty severely, but it was wrapped up and he looked alright. Sylvia helped me find diapers for Solomon and then we departed after we were both assured that our families were doing fine. I promised to stop by to check up on them when we could.
And she couldn’t speak.
Add flour and salt; mix to combine. Stir in Snickers bars and pour into a parchment paper-lined 8x8 inch pan.
On stage will be Dave Berry, Chris Farlowe and WAyne Fontana, with backing from Vanity Fare and special guests the Merseybeats and Terry Sylvester.
That being said... Let's make this one count!
Sometimes mid year production changes are identified by this part of the vehicle identification number.
Back during the WW2 era and the Baby Boomer generation, the big thing was graduating high school. So many kids dropped out to get jobs and help support the family, and obviously entered the work force immediately. College was something that mainly the wealthy did because they could afford it. Obviously, with the wars, and the high percentage of people who served in the military, the GI Bill enabled many vets to go and get a higher education. This translated into the generation before me and my generation. Parents often said " NO! YOU ARE GOING TO COLLEGE!" And now the late part of my generation (and the generation after) is doing college-level work in HS, and basically post-grad stuff in college.
At least this year, many other professional writers and newsmen have realized the concurrent theme in each of his speeches, and his lack of originality. For example, Townhall published a post Wow: RNC Video Highlights Obama SOTU Deja Vu which contains the following video:
Cumin seeds: ¼ tablespoon
The group was the bridge between the pop groups of the 40′s and the Doo Wop groups of the 50′s. Bass vocalist Jimmy Ricks takes the lead which was unusual for the era. They had a loyal following and a whole new generation caught onto them after their career was over.
The Comic Strip, compared to say Absolute Comedy, charges a premium – $15.50 on a thursday versus $10. What does that mean. Well, The Comic Strip audience is already more invested in the show – the more invested you are the more you are going to pay attention. That alone is why open-mike shows need to charge something – even if it’s a twoonie. The Comic Strip brings in acts with credits and background (and showcases then front and centre on the website) – they are not only promoting comedy (the category) but the product (the comic). Rick also spent some money making sure that the place looks good, and he has a dedicated area for comedians selling their wares (CDs, DVDs, T-shirts, etc) – it’s like he’s thinking like a business guy and a comic, something others could learn from.
Stott goes on to make an observation I think is too often underplayed or poo-poohed when it's raised, but which IMO really has tremendous merit:
It finishes with slick oiliness on the tongue with a nice moderate spice bitterness left in the finish. Also, some vanilla and honey on palate.
I have had another visit from my daughter and grandsons over the weekend, which was really lovely. I don't usually see them as often as this because they live nearly 200 miles away. I must have really scared my daughter when she came two weeks ago and I was in such pain. However, she can see that things have really improved since she was last here and that must have been a relief.
The 37th in the series of A to Z visits by Afro-IP's Kingsley Egbuonu to national IP office websites reaches the landlocked West African republic of Niger -- one of the poorest countries in the world, beset by major problems of drought and desertification. This is what Kingsley found:
Maybe it's time I started working on that novel seriously. Maybe I'm meant to write loves stories, with twists and turns and heart wrenching impossible and possible love.
47. Children grow faster in the springtime than any other season during the year.
Kazuo Ishiguro's award-winning novel Never Let Me Go is the tale of Kathy, Ruth and Tommy, and the friendship between them as they grow up together at the quiet and idyllic Hailsham School. As many bloggers will tell you, there is a twist to this particular tale, which I will not spoil for you, despite the fact that I had it ruined for me in the trailer of the recent film (frustrating!) and it is not particularly hard to guess once you read the first couple of chapters.
And, for more poetry, check out the Tuesday Poem: http://tuesdaypoem.blogspot.co.nz/ – you'll see that another collaborative poem is taking shape there to celebrate the Tuesday Poem blog's 2nd birthday.
I hope that helps you get a start on things. Do you have any other farm and food internships tips to share? It can be a tough thing to seek out sometimes! Again, feel free to contact us if you’re interested in any of the positions or have more questions about getting involved with food systems.
Seriously, have you been needing a fresh bit of undead love in your life? Or maybe you're just longing for violence and chaos? Well, I can provide both with a couple quick clicks.
the stamps I used all Unity stamps..
3. My family (and my dog lol) are the most important people in the world to me.
To be fair to would-be budget cutters, some of Labbe's arguments don't hold water: If recidivism rates for Windham School District participants were as greatly reduced as the (source-free, non-Texas specific) statistics she cited, there'd be little problem justifying the expense. However, according to the Austin Statesman, citing Sen. Shapiro, "The recidivism rates for graduates of some Windham programs were not much better than for other convicts."
Menma: Yeah, I know. He’s been… a really cool guy, brightly shining in the light…!
Representative
“By the way, Christopher and Aqua will come,” Bradon said. “It’ll be a double date.”
To this day I’m glad to say that I still don’t really eat fast food. I don’t necessarily avoid it, but it just isn’t as appealing anymore and I don’t really think about. Except for now because writing this post is making me hungry. At McDonald’s, I’m fine with eating the chicken and breakfast, but the burgers still kind of get to me. Other fast food places don’t bother me as much.
It’s hard to pinpoint how I feel about the book—as is probably evident by the hemming and hawing I do throughout this post. At its best, I feel like I’m getting into something really readable and maybe a bit clever, and at its worst, I can’t believe I have to read another 200 pages of this tripe. I think it spends a bit more time hovering at the low end of the spectrum, but I can’t tell if that’s true, or if I’ve just read way too many of these “troubled young lovers” Pulitzer winners (most of which are either pretty bad, or else good in spite of that subplot) and it’s making me more impatient than most folks would be. Certainly there are a lot of really popular romantic comedies out there with scripts I think are terribly lazy and unoriginal. It could be I’m not reading this right. All I can do now is try and make some headway.
Welcome to Lovebug Scrapbooking's "INSPIRE US!" blog hop!! Our blog hops take place on the last Saturday of every month. Thanks so much for joining us!
4 TB of non-dairy milk of choice
10 after
Everyone in town, knew who the Postmaster was-
The Caucasus Mountains is where I have been actually.
Green Flash Brewing Co.
After a lot of research and development, we are finally able to offer an embossing kit to use in your Cricut!
14. International Jet Set
The Fledgling Sparrow and I were out shopping the other night, as night is the only decent time to go shopping when it is hotter than the face of the fucking sun during the daytime; it is so hot that when people in Africa are told how hot it is here in So Cal, they say "Nung m'gubu !kleh pak!" which is African for, "Fuck me, but that is hot!"
I rolled over and looked at my phone. It was 3:30 am, so I sat up in the dark of my room. Fate wants me to see a meteor. The boy was snoring, uncovered. Leg draped across my thigh. The clerestory windows face the east. I see the stars framed by the three. I put my glasses on, propped up some pillows and waited. The sky seemed clear, but I was drifting in and out of sleep. Then it happened, a streak across the night sky, like chalk being drug on a clean slate. Three of them quickly appeared in the windows. I made a wish, then another, then another. I woke three hours later, in the early dawn light, with my glasses on and a kink in my neck not sure if it all was a dream. I made three wishes. I remembered that. I held them deep inside me.
This is her age in Babylonian symbols. I was going to reveal how old she was but then again, she didn't on her blog so the cat shall remain in the bag. Unless you are fluent in Babylonian, you'll never know.
Much better than wrapping paper for the box inside and hopefully will be kept with trinkets or treasures after its intended use as a gift box. Sentiment from PSA Essentials.
St. Desideratus
PAYMENT VIA PAYPAL (PREFERRED): $20.00* – Registrants can use PAYPAL to pay submission fee of $20.00*
Pocket full of posies – Kate
If I do not submit to governing authorities, then who will? If I do not do it, and others do not do it, we will inevitably incite chaos. For the sake of the Gospel, I will represent my Lord in all circumstances.
I'm pleased to say the first three items went quickly at the Whidbey Spin-In, giving me the energy to return home and pull together the next 19. These are a significant step for me in reducing how much is around me, so I am free to focus on the weaving I love -- my rigid heddles, my mechanical-dobby equipped Baby Wolf, and my ever intriguing Bergman Counter-marche loom.
Revlon Lip Butter in Tutti Frutti
I was tired of the conflict, the lack of unity in the whole of Protestantism. I was tired of the theory-based dogmatism on the one end and then theological relativism on the other end. Sometimes the occurred together, and that was really frustrating to me when they did.
Renewal of our hopes, and the dreams we carried in the fleeting furry of months before your losses.......
“Right. That’s great! That’s what it’s for! To take care of yourself , be healthy, stay fit, clear my mind, enhance my mood, and feel great!… That’s a good point, Leigh. You should put that in your blog!”
I peered out my net curtains and had to look a bit smug though. The deep snow had left footprints you see, and it was quite clear that they'd had to come as close as a metre to hit the window.
1.”In him we have redemption through His blood, the forgiveness of sins, in accordance with the riches of God’s grace.” -Ephesians 1:7 (NIV)
That is why a husband can work for the wife and family, yet the family might still feel unloved and lonely. It is why the prostitutes embrace has nothing to do with affection.
ORIGINAL SCREENPLAY
When do I feel happiest being me?
Dumas appears as a character in the Kevin J. Anderson novel Captain Nemo: The Fantastic History of a Dark Genius. He encourages Jules Verne to find his own voice and write about his friend Captain Nemo’s exploits rather than emulate Dumas’ historical fiction.
Watch the turmoil of beings,
1 implement
One: That people who fantasize about rape go on to become rapists and
of course, these fellas admit only mild and minor things, they would hardly talk about more devious agendas as Depopulation, like in this video :
“Tis my pleasure, my lady,” he replied, tucking her hand under his arm and leading her towards the pristine white cloths laid out on the ground. There were cushions for the ladies and the lords to sit on. The knights, being in full armor, preferred to stand, while the squires and pages were busy serving.
The Lord is my shepherd;
January 1, 2001 through December 31, 2011
(3) 77%? What a crock! They should be paid 50% of what men earn.
But all that is for a different posting. No, before that one, or rather those, which seem like they’ll be draining enough to write that I want to be well rested when I do so, I think it would be fun to share why I take the particular subject of the divine to write about. And the answer is, I had a question.
We were together for a year and a half. I was pretty stupid about it too, because we started dating before she had completely broken up with her then-boyfriend. She had recently moved to my hometown and hadn’t broken up with her boyfriend. They were attempting to have a bit of a long-distance relationship, and I was simply too dumb to fully realize that she was cheating on him with me, and that she would likely cheat on me with someone else if given the chance. So rather than admit to my stupidity in every other sentence of this post, let’s just assume I’m always admitting to being a complete idiot when I was with her, shall we? In any case, I was happy as a clam to be with her. She was my first very serious girlfriend and was also my first lay.
along with a few standards, Californian handroll (fresh crab, they
I have some really fun things to show you this week! I've been a sewing diva lately. From sewing my own cute pajama bottoms, to refashioning projects. Stay tuned!
Joel Barrett and David Seymour have been happily partnered for 6 years. They first met at the Daily Grind, a coffee shop which Joel used to manage. David decided to try the coffee at the shop and Joel immediately made his intentions known when they met. About 3 months later they went on their first date. Due to many other factors surrounding their relationship, race plays a very small role in any tensions they may experience from others.
I just couldn’t pass the opportunity to buy a book with such a title for one Canadian dollar (well, 1.13 after you throw in the taxes…).
So, Mom, I hope you saw your beautiful send-off. Saw your children's, grandchildren and little great-grandchldren's tears as well as smiles as they remembered life here on earth with you, and talking about all the happy good times with a mother, sister, aunt, MIL, SIL, grandmother, great-grandmother who taught us all the true meaning of family love.
But this was different, as it wasn't MY job, but instead a fabulous new opportunity. I was working at Waffle House.
Yes. No. Yes. Yes.
4. it's 1356hrs here and nothing has been faxed over to the doc.
2009 research outcomes
Paws - small blossom BPB, trimmed flat on one side
That new idea became my first published novel, Mondays are Red. And then came others and suddenly I was a YA novelist and left the adult stuff behind. The other book lay half-written somewhere. But ideas are never wasted. They become other things. They strengthen the foundations of our writing lives. Sometimes, later, they seek sunlight. So, after 15 years, thedormant seed sown randomly in a London underground station began to grow and I began to write it. I didn't look at the first version because this one would be different. I was different by then, though still fascinated by chance and luck.
A sudden fear, a secret flame:
Got lunch under control!
Number of Pages: 376
Really GREAT, right!? I LOVED this sketch the moment I saw it and couldn’t wait to get started! It is my goal to scrapbook more this year and these sketches are JUST the thing to get me going!
At times made me think,
(Matthew 7:21-23 (NIV))
I just love the masked off look with sponging! Heather was the first stamper I saw do this, and she has really started a trend! It is everywhere. I used my hexagon cutters and sponged on the inside. I removed the cutter, masked the shape with post-its, and stamped the silhouette image from Stamp School's Flowers for Mom and used the sympathy from Christian Sympathy, also from Stamp School.
A more *TRADITIONAL* Alpha or monkey in the middle type is able to handle female attention towards him in a non chalant manner and not be so moved buy it b/c he knows deep down that if he wants to move onto greener pasture he will without all the game playing and manipulation tactics. Guys and girls with options who have made a conscious decision to be in a LTR will often subtly and nicely fan the flirting flames of male and female floozies. It becomes a win-win for all parties involved. The flirting floozies won’t feel completely kicked to the curb, the SO will be happy they are with someone who respects their feelings, and the center of attention can feel confident that he/she made everyone feel happy in a scenario that could have gotten really really ugly.
Pressure built at the back of his neck, like one of those itches that moves when you try to scratch it. Pevan said she liked the feel of the Sherim, something about the way it touched her skin. It had no right to behave like that with his sister. He was all the way around the back of the door again and coming back to the front. He couldn’t feel the lean, but he knew he was almost eight feet off the ground, and leaning far enough over that, if normal gravity still held, he’d fall flat on his face.
-Egon Schiele, Austrian painter
Perhaps life is all this "meant to be".
I had to stop reading my own fan fiction on www.fanfiction.net because it was having a disastrous effect on my own writing! I was writing a pastiche of myself. So I drop in every now and again to see things like which characters from Stravaganza are attracting the most interest and so on. But I don't read it.
When they worked up an appetite during a recent planning session, here’s the cheese they dove into for lunch:
Lots of talk about the austerity in Europe and how it doesn't seem to be working well. But less well publicized is that we have essentially switched to austerity here in the US as many of the 50 states have had to turn to pretty drastic cuts just as the federal fiscal stimulus fades out. What does it mean, well the Wall Street Journal decided to see what the unemployment rate would be without all the cuts to government jobs and they find that it would be 7.1%. But this does not take into account all of the general equilibrium effects. As they state:
(I would like to apologize for not inserting any photos for this post. It has been too darn hot, for one; and I have been spending all week helping to move my son’s and my daughter’s families.)
However, last week we visited the paediatrician for Abacus’s last (for now) MMR vaccination, and I raised to her my concern that Abacus isn’t talking much. I know that Mittens is quite articulate for his age – I’ve overheard some of his classmates and I can’t really make out what they’re saying, whereas he has very little trouble with words. As a toddler, he was able to very easily repeat (new) words back to us simply by listening, with Abacus that doesn’t come as easily to him, although you can see that he’s thinking about it, and looking at my mouth, and trying to speak it. And he gives up if he can’t really get it.
and so do I...
And describe the moons Tengo did. By the novel's end, Tengo, and Murakami, not only described them very well but bashed them into the readers' head, over and over, until the reader's head bleeds. After reading, I looked outside the window and my mouth fell open. There were two moons hanging in the sky, this 2Q12 sky, one grey and one green.
Hi there...
Here are my thoughts on the subject:
Gas station attendant Marny Toogood thinks it’s just another ordinary day on the job until an urgent message from a young girl in the backseat of a car draws him into a daring rescue attempt. Now he is on the run with Esther and William Rose from their insane “uncle” who thinks it is his mission from God to protect William, a boy with incredible faith that gives him supernatural powers.
by David Mazzucchelli, 2009
It’ll be interesting to see how AVATAR ages. The big CGI sequences (which make up the bulk of the film) are really a sight to behold but the story is a bit simple and predictable. Cameron the Writer offers too much hack and ham throughout the film, which will hurt AVATAR as the CGI that dazzles us today becomes commonplace tomorrow.
The movie’s name is “The Adventures of Super Bra!”
Of course, it's always a challenge to photograph the exact color of a wall, but the photo above is fairly accurate. Some of you noticed the color when I shared the changes we made to the entertainment center...
The people who were involved in the rally represented a significant number of Malaysians who have as much of a stake and future in the country as every Malaysian does. They were not fun-seekers or rebels but thoughtful citizens who wanted to determine the fate of the country in a democratic way through fair and free elections.
The girls needed new spring/fall jackets to replace their old ones, which were size, ahem, 24 months. After our ice cream stop, I took off for OshKosh with Allie and Em while Rich paid the bill with Anna, who was still eating. We struck gold. Spring/fall jackets were 70% off and were $18 each. Rain boots were 50% off, which was not a huge bargain but cheaper than the ones at Target.
More blind blind auditions:
This fleecy hair also gives them a woolly, squeezable appearance.
People I'm tagging.
So, you should have just come from Chelle's Creations - http://chelles-creations.blogspot.com/ - and picked up a beautiful border cluster.. Now I have a fun little journal cluster to add to your collection..
These were completely experimental with whatever I had lying around the pantry. And they turned out great ! I will not lie, I surprised myself. And the best thing is that it is super quick and quite healthy. I would make these cute cookies for a baby shower or even a bridal shower !
For, archaic astronomy, and the ancient, physical and mathematical sciences, expressed views identical with those of modern science, and many of far more momentous import. A “struggle for life” as a “survival of the fittest” in the worlds above, as on our planet here below, are distinctly taught. This teaching, however, although it would not be “entirely rejected” by Science, is sure to be repudiated as an integral whole. For it avers that there are only seven Self-born primordial “gods” emanated from the trinitarian ONE. In other words, it means that all the worlds or sidereal bodies (always on strict analogy) are formed one from the other, after the primordial manifestation at the beginning of the “Great Age” is accomplished. The birth of the celestial bodies in Space is compared to a crowd or multitude of “pilgrims” at the festival of the “Fires.” Seven ascetics appear on the threshold of the temple with seven lighted sticks of incense. At the light of these the first row of pilgrims light their incense sticks. After which every ascetic begins whirling his stick around his head in space, and furnishes the rest with fire. Thus with the heavenly bodies. A laya-centre is lighted and awakened into life by the fires of another “pilgrim,” after which the new “centre” rushes into space and becomes a comet. It is only after losing its velocity, and hence its fiery tail, that the “Fiery Dragon” settles down into quiet and steady life as a regular respectable citizen of the sidereal family. Therefore it is said:—
You are connected to something way out there…
While the Hoppe is a solid example of balanced brewing, being an "Imperial Extra Pale Ale", it doesn't quite rise to the challenge of the Grès des Vosges. The cheese is just a hair too formidable for the beer, which I think is due to my underestimation of the cheese when I first sampled it. All it requires is a swig or two more of the Hoppe and that does the trick, but I feel I could do better with the pairing.
But I’m still a head busta
Ahhhh. That's where it gets interesting. It's about soul. It's about the soul of the wearer/maker made visible on the garment. It's a piece of clothing that has the hand and the soul of someone visible on its surface or in its construction. It could be patched. It could have handwork. It could be just a handmade garment, but there would be something about it that made it obvious that this garment meant something to the person who wore it.
There is a recommended bail schedule that magistrates use to set bond for all crimes. A state jail felony, including cruelty to animals, can be as low as $500 or as much as $100,000 if the suspect is already on felony probation.
As they go through the questions they type in the answer if they know it. If they don’t know it I ask them to look up the answer in their book, and, this is now the geeky science bit, they repeat the question and answer, thus fitting in with what the scientists have just proven, it helps the pupils visualise and remember the answer.
There are a lot of Marys in the Bible. So far there are: the virgin Mary, Jesus’ mother; Mary the sister of Martha; Mary the mother of the Apostle James (although there are two apostles named James and I don’t know which one is her son); and Mary Magdalene, who Jesus healed of demons, and who (along with the Virgin Mary) was one of the first to discover that Jesus’ tomb was empty after his resurrection. The Mary mentioned here is the sister of Martha.
If you’re NOT a Christian and/or church-goer, I would love to hear what’s keeping you at a distance. Leave a comment and let me know!
I want to wish all the Mothers a Happy Day! It is a special day and it so good we take the day to celebrate the love we feel for the Mother's in our life.
While there were the unknowns of infighting within his party, Umno, the inability of the opposition to formulate a unified message and move beyond capitalising on negative angst against the BN and Umno, continued to work in BN’s favour.
Friday I had to teach my all-day workshop. Luckily there were only about 10 people in the class, so I wasn't asburned out as I usually get from my workshops. At luch I went to Mulates, a famous local restaurant. I had a fried-Alligator Po-boy for lunch. When we asked teh waiter what Alligator tasted like he said "Like Chicken, squid, and frog-legs". I don't know what frog-legs taste like (nor will I ever, thank you Muppet Movie) but now I do know what Alligator tastes like. Like sweet, rubbery chicken. I liked it. Brian didn't care much for it. For our evening repast we had Asian Fusion. We figured we'd had our share of local food, now we could get what we wanted.
My jaw continues to drop every time I pull up to the gas pump, the price per gallon seeming to rise on a daily basis, right along with my blood pressure. It wasn’t that long ago five bucks got me through the week. Now, it gets me to and from work once. Oh sure, the price drops a few cents every now and then, just enough for everyone to think $3.60 for a gallon of gas is a real bargain. But, sure as the tide, it’ll spike again to $3.80, then $4.00...etc.
I have been offered two sections of an intermediate composition class for design students at the Cleveland Institute of Arts, so I might be doing more musical chairs for the fall. Last-minute panicking. Yesterday I spent hours developing the most insane class - I will teach Dick Hebidge! then I Love Dick! then Madame Bovary! And who knows maybe Danielle Duttons' SPRAWL! Oh the design in Madame Bovary the gorgeously layers of the wedding feast the choreography of the ball where Emma begins afterwards to let her real life go! I chucked that out because I'm not supposed to assign that much. I DO think I will teach Arcades Project and Gail Scott's My Paris. Maybe Rachel Levitsky's Neighbor, so much about spaces and boundaries and cities. Maybe Berger's Ways of Seeing and David Markson's Wittgenstein's Mistress, which is John's favorite contemporary novel. Critical books like the Substance of Style and Modernity at Large: Cultural Dimensions of Globalization. The Ubu web PDF of Mallarme's Throw of the Dice. Some elit poems John sent me. For films Daisies? Chris Marker? RMaybe William Gibson's Pattern Recognition? I have to read it to see if it holds up. In some ways I model myself on that character in Pattern Recognition, the style hunter, who cuts out all the labels from her clothes and wears all black, Muji, simple, plain clothes.
I created two cards, one for Easter and one for a woman/girl for any occasion.
And the conversations went something like this.
This weekend was especially sweet. On Saturday we had dinner with our dear friends at their house. Our girls are best friends, we love their company, and boy can they cook!!!! It's always such a teat to eat at their house! I made these cookies for our dessert. Hearts because we love our friends; green because it's March!
6 Tvc 15
I finished this little project a while ago for our bathroom wall. Love the colors and the way it turned out. It brings sweet smiles and memories every time we see it! If your interested in how I created this read the details below.
6 large dried apricot, chopped or 3 tbsp very small currants
One day it's your baby's first birthday. The next it's your Dad's 62nd. Day after day passes by, adding up to years and faded memories.
At that point it was time to bring it into the garage to start working on its "skin." We used those packing papers (newspaper sheets) and a paper mache mixture to spread the sheets over the wires.
About ten years ago I cut off the tip of my finger (these types of incidents happen when you are constantly thinking of what comes NEXT instead of being focused on what you're doing NOW) -- I forget the context, but it wasn't quilting -- stuck the bit of skin back on, put on a really neat bandaid I had just purchased, and three days later when I took the bandaid off, the skin was fully attached back on my finger! Those bandaids were so miraculous every time I used them that I went to get some more just last week. They apparently are not sold any more. Too bad. They were so good - but very expensive.
The silence from a satisfied head and heart echoes loudly in the ears saying -
tofu.
The proper name for a group of goats is a trip.
“One step, one breath, one smile at a time…” -RF
So, here’s my plan.
I have yet to see someone with such patience and love that she has for everyone who connects to her. As she listened to all my problems she began her healing for me. She also suggested some changes in life style, gave me the names of books I could read and incorporate the suggestions from them in my daily life and as we spoke I felt lighter. Something drained out of my body (which I later came to know as energy blocks).
Bring beautiful flowers , that can cure.
Focus on the Family believes that every student—no matter who they are or what they believe—should be protected from harm. But at the same time, laws should not be passed that can used as tools to sexualize and politicize the entire school environment. There are good alternatives that provide protection to kids, but avoid entrapment in identity politics—such as the fair and objective model anti-bullying policy language drafted by the Alliance Defense Fund.
July 28, 2011
In recent days Pyongyang’s state media reported North Koreans rallied in the streets to demand South Korean president Lee Myung-bak be killed.
Most days, we want to run away
Monday 6th February
“Begging your pardon most deeply, sir. It has worked, as you can see.”
As they played, Chris was paying more attention to the new pictures on the wall instead of the table. There were autographed shots of some famous players in Philadelphia Eagles history including Chuck Bednarik, Bill Bergey, Ron Jaworski, and Harold Carmichael, as well as a few Philadelphia Flyers such as Bobby Clarke, Bernie Parent, and Hank’s favorite, Ken Linesman, who was there not because of his ability but for his nickname: “The Rat.” Hank had a very successful high school football career but never had the coordination for hockey. Regardless, a Flyers game was a great way to get out of the house, take clients for drinks, and afterwards land at one of several strip clubs in the Philly/South Jersey area, like “Cheerleaders,” the one where he met Mandy back when he was still with his first wife.
“Yes, Lord,” he said, “you know that I love you.”
Depending on how long you decide to fast, it is recommended that you seek a physician’s approval first. Being pre-diabetic, I have learned through experience that I cannot go completely without food for a day and will have to make modifications to my own fast.
“Help me into the front seat. You drive. Don’t forget the kid, but don’t get her until you got him in my trunk. She doesn’t need to see that.” Before John went to the red Mustang he looked black into the night, picked up the driver’s gun from the weeds, and slipped it into his backpack before carrying both the pack and the girl to the backseat of the police car. John locked up both the rented Mustang and the Cadillac before getting behind the wheel and making sure everyone else was in place.
How did I spend 23 years without this wonderful concoction?!
“For now, why don’t we just focus on getting to my village? Maybe you’ll find the answers you’re looking for there.” Naida’s words had a comforting edge to them rather than an accusing one.
Even if your counselor knows about Aspergers Syndrome - or Autism, it's probable that they only understand it in the classic sense. A lot has changed over the years and the perception of aspies as people without empathy has undergone a drastic change recently. Unless your counselor is aware of this, they won't be in a position to help the relationship.
As a result of all of these changes in my life - I'm not sure how much blogging I'm going to be able to do in the next couple of months. I really can't say! I DO plan on continuing Ready, Set, Craft! - you just may have to live with continued inconsistency until we get through the holidays! I do hope you understand!
This energy accumulates, our minds add stories and labels to it…we call events “unfair”, “hurtful”, “stressful”, “frustrating” the list can go on and on.
Love stays when everyone else has gone home or moved on love still lingers. Love grows with each passing moment of separation and each stroke of the pen to paper. Love never no never fails! Although the relationship ended, or the person left love didn’t fail. Love is something that you can hold on too long after the lover has gone. Love never fails. That’s why Love deserves an Oscar.
At first, the stickers are a novelty and nothing more. As a kid, you might stick them all over your bedside table or chest of drawers, and because so many varieties are available on that lolly shelf, you end up with random scenes from a dozen cartoon shows. Freakier still are the stickers based on an entirely original IP. I once bought two pieces of gum and wound up with two ghastly images for my drawers: one was a cartoon picture of a kid being hit by a truck. He’s bleeding…he’s screaming. His skateboard lies on the road beside the pool of blood, and the faceless truck driver is about to run over that too. Above the carnage is the caption, ‘Horror!’ Yes, it is, but worse still is the next sticker: a cartoon picture of a jar full of eyeballs, severed limbs and…cherries. A label on the jar reads ‘Female Body with Cherries’. The caption above the scene reads ‘Ho Ho Horror!’, as if we’re laughing. As if ‘Female Body with Cherries’ is a joke, or witty at all. Even more disturbing is the idea that while the body parts in the fruit jar is meant to be the comedy variety of the sticker, that screaming kid being hit by the truck is just meant to scare you. It’s horror, and your red piece of chewing gum doesn’t seem so tasty now.
Monkey ring: eBay.com
The KONY2012 project has the goal of stopping Joseph Kony through mass information dissemination. If more people will know what he is doing, more people will realize that there is a need to arrest him. And if more people will demand for his arrest, the government will notice and most probably take action.
We, as humans, have long set aside a special place in our societies for beverages. Water is needed for life, and needed constantly, but those drinks that are made and not found have been used in rituals both social and religious since the times of the most ancient cultures. In ancient Sumerian worship services, beer was the beverage used as a celebration of fertility; in China and Japan, tea became the center of very complex and formalized social ceremony. In pre-colonial South America, chocolate was the literal beverage of the gods, while in the middle east coffee was adopted as part of ritual hospitality. Wine has long held importance to Catholicism for its role in Holy Communion, while spirits have in many cases become symbols of national identity—vodka in Poland, Russia, and many other surrounding states; whiskey in Ireland and Scotland; rum in the Caribbean regions and for a time, the patriotic colonists of the early United States as the first distilled spirit they could produce. Even in everyday use, our beverages are used as a social glue; the classic after-work beer or cocktail, beloved of workers of all stripes and a fine way to spend an evening bonding with those you may know only professionally. The English afternoon tea, more acceptable in some social circles, and often an important means of social contact and information. Going for a coffee together is almost a cliché of dating today, as it offers an acceptably brief, public, and neutral activity in which to get first impressions. Spirits and wines are drunk for life and death both; weddings, funerals, births, and a variety of events both personal and public.
Moving on to the reception: average cost for beverages (alcoholic and non-alcoholic) can cost up to $3377, where as ours only cost $700, and lasted the whole weekend. Average cost of meals is over $5000, but the average reception venue is around $700.
This was David Hamilton's final Pops - he upgraded from Radio 1 to Radio 2 in November and with him only having done the show thirteen times and Kid's introduction proving successful I imagine the thought was someone had to give way. Don't ask Diddy why, his Killing Of Georgie Fame anecdote suggests he still thinks his last show was six months earlier. But that's not the reason, tempting as it is, why this week in particular has attracted so much attention. Nobody really knows whether it's true BBC4 were going to skip this show for playback quality reasons - the initial schedules missed it out, but then initial schedules did that twice in 1976/2011. This is one of four shows, the others from before the BBC4 run started, that were wiped but recovered in 2009 from Diddy's personal collection, taped to Philips N1500. Essentially it's given the show a visual Instagram filter, the slightly off-perfect look of an old video recording but on proper telly, adding a whole new layer of nostalgia.
I told my friend if I could just fast-forward to even just March 1, I will be in a better place. And now I have to end this because the garage door just went up signalling that Mr. Manic is home so I have to go play Nice Wife.
I asked her if H.E. sounded familiar.
Don’t be a ticker.
We've tried to keep busy. We had an Easter egg hunt at the house, took the kids bowling, have done a bunch of talking and cooking, had to have one kid (Ryan) get stitches, and took a quick trip downtown.
I really love how my two girls can be so different and yet get along so well. They are the best of sisters.
Unless you are Harry Wilder.
Oh by the way, “desecration” is in the eye of the muslim beholder:
We’re thinking about planting a crop that we’ll harvest in several months. We’re thinking about how we will utilize that crop. We’re thinking about how and what we’ll eat during the winter months. We are thinking about tomorrow. Our thinking, though, is limited to our own concerns and not those of others.
1/2 cup grated motzarella cheese
Happy or Moody most of the time: Happy. I haven't been moody at all really. Well I don't think I have been. Who knows what Ryan would say. I have been trying really hard to do some extra things for him since he has been such a rock star the last few months with me being all lazy and not wanting to do much. He really is sooo amazin. Love him.
What she really said: I am better than you at life. I have my priorities straight, and get everything done. I won't let anyone see that sometimes I'm not in control of my life. I will reach down (from my pedestal) and try to lift you up to my standards.
Tell us a little bit about yourself, e.g., what region of the US do you live in, what do you do, anything you'd like to share.
The Observer's report also quoted FCR spokesman Loren Riegelhaupt, who stated that the first building to open, along with the arena, would be residential. That means that Building 1, aka Miss Brooklyn, remains on hold until an anchor tenant is found, as the New York Times first reported last month. It also means that, unless certain parts of Building 1 are completed, the arena would open without the Urban Room, the atrium that would serve as a combination building lobby, arena entrance, subway entrance, retail/restaurant space, and public gathering space.
The Toy Story 3D ride was by far the longest line we had to wait in. I think it was 75 minutes, or something ridiculous like that, that made the ride less enjoyable by the time we got on it. I love this picture of Nate and Kyla, but unfortunately the ride wasn't a hit for her.
As the weekend of free fashion shows begins, savvy shoppers will be able to enjoy some fantastic discounts and offers at many of Cabot Circus’ stores and restaurants.
10/09/2007 33.69
2.Boil rice adding salt, cardamom, cloves, bay leaf and cinnamon.Drain and set aside.
